Both, both, my lord.
Lucky me!
Repeat: No.
My ingredients are from Trader Joes.
Hello! I'm back from a long weekend in DC, visiting my brother and his girlfriend. I'm really excited to announce that my master bedroom was featured in the brand new House of Fifty magazine! The Fall issue is out today, and it is really fantastic - lots of color and pattern, which is my favorite. Please go here to check out the whole issue, and my room is on page 15.
“Maraal, give me the weapon. Let's talk about how we'll get you to your ship.”
syrup, passion fruit juice and fresh lime; the Mole Manhattan made
NEW! Of the three interns we hire, we want one to have a strong emphasis on social media communications. If you have a student with this strength, please encourage them to apply.
Walking in the mall the other day I saw a cute sight that made me smile..and was thankful that God allowed that adorable sight for my eyes to behold...and I counted the gifts:
Here’s a couple of short videos I made on my ipad with the help of my wonderful friend Carmen. I’m demonstrating Viva Decor Inka-Gold cream paints which I just love while Carmen is holding the ipad.
I'm always driving away when I cry
Our new Mad for Markers Challenge is a 'New Colour Combination' AND we are going back to monthly challenges. My mojo seems to have disappeared so I am going to cheat and show a couple of creations from the past showing what were new colour combos to me then.
May Archangel Gabriel, the Divine Messenger of the Archangels, Divinely Guide your Mind, your voice, your hands and lead you to a new adventure of Cosmic Creativity.
Mood: Sunset is almost synonymous with endings in writing. Sunset is the waning of the day, and a time where characters slow their activity and reflect upon recent events. Using sunset in a setting can create a feeling of time running out, of actions nearing completion and signal the 'letting go' of emotions for the time being.
Please make sure to follow each blog and comment on each post and subscribe to each youtube channel and comment on youtube video's for your chance to win some amazing prizes.
We arrived in Kauai, Hawaii on Friday afternoon, February 3. What a wonderful anniversary present! I can't think of much anything better than celebrating 5 years of marriage to Ben by spending 2 weeks in paradise, together as a family!
It truly seems like Marcos would rather just forget that he made this album. Obviously (see the comments below from readers), some people like this album or at least find it pleasant. I could call it pleasant, in fact, since it's not as if it *offends* me or anything. It's not terrible music; it's just not terribly interesting.
the 1997 film features an entire era of this band, primarily
both of them try to figure out what i really mean when i keep life SO simple for them. i'm very specific, pick up that blue pen on the table. and em starts to shake and looks around trying to figure out why i might need the pen or where else the pen could be and has an audible "ahh" like she's going to explode when all i want is exactly what i just said. i never give choices or am vague, but they always guess what else i could possibly mean, to ASSURE they get in trouble, when all they have to do is exactly what i say, which i make easy. ugh!
TAKE THAT SPINA BIFIDA!
Removing the paper element from a novel (“immersive reading” in Shatzkin parlance) does nothing or next to nothing to the content. The same cannot be said of picture books, where the constraints of paper bookmaking are built into the tradition of picture book creation. No novelist drafts for a trim size. Picture book artists most definitely sketch for an aspect ratio, if not a specific trim size. Form and content are damned near inseparable.
x2 metres of Navy Blue/White Polka Dot remnant pieces.
For the first single, I decided to go straight to my old 1RM of 215#. Jack was nearby and observed. When it was done, I think we both agreed that it was a valid lift in that it went below parallel and came back upright again, but not really a good lift. Still got foward a bit. Needed to drive up faster. Desptite that, I felt confident that I could do more and simultaneously clean it up, so I went after 225#.
You don't need to spend an enormous amount of time on this either! Even if you have just 15 minutes, this time will definitely help you gain more skill and feel more comfortable with free motion quilting. Check out this post to find a quick way to practice every single day.
Hebrews 9: 27-28
Most people I encounter still have no idea that their ego’s “personality” is temporary and extremely limited to their own views of who they think they are. They get stuck inside the 3D ego game without using their Soul GPS (galactic positioning system) to navigate. More commonly they become paralyzed within the opposing opposites of polarity – do I choose love or fear?
3 days ago, the cat wakes me up at 4am, sprinting around my bedroom. Something lands on my hand and I freak, but I see nothing so I go back to sleep. 6am rolls around and still the cat is in full hunt-mode. And I see it, hovering in the corner by my pile of “need-to-decide-if-I-will-keep-these” clothes. Much more ready to fright back this time, I decide to grab a broom and help the poor kitty-cat, but after doing a team-tag approach that was less than successful for about 30 minutes, I let the cat do it’s thing and take a shower. The two were on the other side of the house, so I figured I was safe. Of course, the car comes into the bathroom with NO dead roach. I search the house high and low for the damned bugger, but nothing! NOTHING!! So, I tell Mr. Cat to do his job, or he won’t get play time tonight (!!) and head out to work clear across town (1.5 hours!!). Upon arrival, I decide to grab my ID out of my purse, so I can get into the school and what comes skittering towards me?!?!?!? THE DAMNED ROACH!!! Now let me just say, my hand was in and out of that purse many times during that 1.5 hours for my kindle, hairbrush and wallet. GAH! I literally threw my purse out my car window, getting out and kicking it until I saw the roach run off. Disgusted and freaked out, I started my day.
In our first meeting for this term we will discuss Alain Badiou’s The Communist Hypothesis.
More evidence that medicine is more of an art form than a science-based practice.
And I am delighted to announce that the Blog Hop winner for my blog is
you will be helped. You have a profound effect on raising your vibration when
The police affidavit said an “exchange of gunfire took place after Byrd fired at the officers.” A spokeswoman for Attorney General Jim Hood has said Byrd was killed when he entered Abraham’s office wearing a ski mask and “pointed an assault weapon” at one of the investigators.
When the grief wears off, they home-brew another camera, and before long they are staking it in water again.
Our country is taking its sweet time to dole out justice to the culprits behind the illegal election robocalls one year ago. It’s been two months since this story came out involving Andrew Prescott, and no charges are pending for even the CPC Guelph campaign for violating disclosure rules. Examples of the robocalls paid for would have had to be provided to Elections Canada with the campaign’s post-election submission of financial records. Clearly, our justice system is failing Canadians.
So, are you a grown unschooler (I'm going to say 17 and up. Younger unschoolers have just as wonderful things to say, but I'd like this particular series of interviews to focus on older unschoolers.)? Would you mind answering a few questions? Well, here are said questions! This is NOT an all or nothing deal: feel free to ignore some questions if they don't apply, or if you're simply not interested in answering. All I ask is that you please answer all three of The Basics questions, and at least five questions beyond that.
One of my regular readers, themaninthemoon, asked me recently if I knew what a "gentleman's buffet" was. You can still occasionally see this legend engraved on the glass doors of some of our oldest pubs.
Penni
I was a journalist (Danbury News-Times, Ct), before becoming a teacher, and continue to write for professional journals. I have written several study guides for Penguin Books and write for Education Update, a newspaper based in New York City. (www.educationupdate.com). I’ve interviewed many authors, college presidents, and scientists. I wrote “The Kentucky Derby’s Forgotten Jockeys” for Smithsonian Magazine's website, www.smithsonian.com. (April, 2009). Two essays have been published in book anthologies; one for Wisdom of Our Mothers, (Familia Books) and the other in “College Search and Parent Rescue: Essay for Parents by Parents of College-Going Students.” (St. Martin’s Press). I was a middle school Language Arts teacher for more than 10 years and have just completed a five year grant position under No Child Left Behind in Newark, NJ public schools.
3. Then type the closed italicized tag, followed by the closed bold tag.
"You remember what I told you the other day?" he asked Arvin.
Phase One of a bear market brings stock prices down sharply. That’s what happened when the Dow Jones Industrial Average fell from 14,164 in October 2007 to 6,440 on March 9, 2009—a tumble of 54%.
And I have been DYING to tell you all that I was going, and I COULD NOT, because we were surprising our bestest friend Todd there, upon the occasion of his 40th birthday...and Todd is a regular reader, y'see. So, this was not ONLY a decadent, kid-free, money-and-diet-be-damned vacation...it was also a SUPER-SECRET vacation. Woohoo! (And, it was also, by default - as we can't afford another one - our 10th anniversary vacation, albeit about six months early. Hope we make it that much longer, honey, just to make our claim on that title legit. Kisses!)
The architects’ strategy was to compose the plan first and then wrap it in a tight skin, so the building’s function is the source of its exuberant form. Spaces are arranged along the interior according to frequency of use and various levels of privacy to break down the 6995-sf space into discrete interlocking volumes. The kitchen and primary living spaces occupy the ground level, with direct access to the terraces and the adjacent landscape. In the living room, floor-to-ceiling windows are set at grade to create a seamless and porous relationship with the landscape. The master bedroom suite is accessed via two separate sets of stairs, neither of which is directly connected to the public spaces to preserve privacy during events. The rest of the house’s program areas are located across a wide landing at the main entry, which offers another layer of privacy from visitors. Placing all of the spaces the residents use most frequently—the kitchen and main living spaces, master bedroom and offices—in easy reach effectively reduces the house’s apparent scale. Strategic cuts in the building skin allow for diagonal views through the house and out to the landscape beyond, thereby drawing relationships between seemingly isolated spaces so multiple areas can be appreciated simultaneously.
From the photos you can see the entire east wall has been recently cut and more importantly you can see that the ears on the Anubis glyph are not quite finished , some time afterwards the artist returned to finish up.
We wonder why is it the doorkeepers are brought up at this particular point in the historical narrative? Well, you might say, it just so happened to be the case that the king could not sleep and the book of the record of the chronicles was read to the king. Yes this is true. From man’s perspective it was simply a coincidence that the king happened to be reading about the plot of the doorkeepers. But, we know that God works through all things for the good of His elect people. Certainly there must have been volumes of other things that had happened day in and day out in the kingdom and were written down in the chronicles that could have been read to the king that night. Yet God in His perfect orchestration of all things, moved in the small details of even the man turning the pages of that book of records to land upon an account that would capture the king’s interest; and God also moved in the life of the king to perk up his ears to listen carefully at that particular point and to cause him to ask what honor and dignity had been done to Mordecai for this? The book of Esther reveals over and over again that God is sovereign, and that He is in complete control of all things that happen. The name of God is not mentioned in Esther. And no obvious references are even made to Him, but His controlling providential hand is seen repeatedly throughout as things unfold.
“They just got back to me yesterday. I wanted to surprise you with the news, but you were at work, and I didn’t want to tell the whole bar. It’s not like you could’ve heard me over that godawful country crap they play in there.”
SST Course- SGD 620
Cuzco is my favorite city so far. I mean, okay, so basically my choices were Lima and Cuzco, but Cuzco is still awesome. We were musing about how European it felt, and that it was also similar to New Orleans. The common thread hit us like the Golden Corral frying pan: Spanish influence! I wonder how you say “duh” in Spanish. We ate dinner at the restaurant suggested by the guy at the front desk and it was awesome. For the rest of the evening we shopped. In fact, before we even made it to the restaurant, a woman with a lot of hats and belts and a baby on her back attacked us and managed to sell my sister a hat, which she was glad to have after sunset when it went from chilly to cold. We took pictures of the woman and her baby, and I think I’m going to paint her when I get home.
Fat chance. From party to pavement, from big events to shopping trips, Victoria, 37, is like a one-woman Mount Rushmore — forever stony and unyielding, the very picture of bottomless granite gloom.
8. A Christmas Sighting ('Twas The Night Before Christmas)
Before the pain meds wear off, were going to try get some shut eye.
The same is true of course at every level. At the level of Synchronicity, standing in a line at Starbucks is an opportunity to talk to someone, meditate, ponder, or simply be. It is what is, and we’ll get our latte when we get it. And we seem to also have more and more magical moments. We decide to forgive someone in our hearts and they unexpectedly call to apologize. The very thing we have wanted (but been peacefully unattached to having) shows up. The lines are actually shorter. When I tap into this level of peaceful openheartedness, I find things come to me easily and effortlessly.
Basically, Holley shares from her heart to bless other women's hearts by telling them this one important truth: they're already amazing.
Oh The Feojoada! I invited about 25 of my friends for a nite of the
It also gave me the chance to ink up some of my newly purchased stamps. It was unusual for me as I have gotten so used to using digital stamps and the ability to re-size images where you can't with clear pvc stamps, so it was a nice change up.
On the way down to the river bank we had caught a glimpse of a rat in the bushes but had assumed that he had run away to hide. As we stood looking at the river, however, he reappeared. Though we could not get close, to him, the rat stayed around and showed interest in what we were doing. This leads me to suspect that he gets fed by people who come down to the bank to eat their lunchtime sandwiches. Rats get bad press – mostly because of misapprehensions about them and deliberate misinformation – but I found this fellow rather appealing, though I had nothing to give him.
I believe it was a "friend" who rang on both counts. I also believe this "friend" was just so ill informed of CFS/ME they didn't understand that wearing jeans, driving a car, walking the dog & going to Salsa, the first time round & crafting the second time round we're actually not benefit fraud!!!
If you'd like to sign up for either of these events, or for the Dennis Lehane cocktail party/fundraiser on Friday, March 4 at 6:30 pm at the Hagen Ranch Road Library in Delray Beach, it's easy & all online here: Writers Live!
From the Navajo (trans. Jerome K. Rothenberg)
This fun Bo Bunny Crush line of paper was a perfect fit for what I had in mind for the sketch and fit the concept I had for the sketch perfectly.
Khirad: Khizar is gay, Ashar. He liked my duppata. Gay men go nuts for chiffon and pretty girls.
"Because all else is worse. Until the New Sun comes, we have but a choice of evils. All have been tried, and all have failed. Goods in common, the rule of the people...everything. You wish for progress? The Ascians have it. They are deafened by it, crazed by the death of Nature till they are ready to accept Erebus and the rest as gods. We hold humankind stationary...in barbarism. The Autarch protects the people from the exultants, and the exultants...shelter them from the Autarch. The religious comfort them. We have closed the roads to paralyze the social order..."
all those leaves are still there.
Let’s just suppose that one would seek water baptism to wash away his sins using Acts 22:16 as guide. What does that do with the work of the cross? Using the words of Paul in 1 Corinthians 1:17, the “cross of Christ should be made of none effect.” I remind you also of the words of the apostle in Romans 3:20.
I don't consider it a redux if it isn't just a bit different from the original experience. So, while these cupcakes adhere closely to the recipe shared by Sprinkles' Candace Nelson, they are given an extra intensity of flavor courtesy of Adrienne at Gastroanthropology and her recipe for Slow Roasted Strawberries. The additional time required in Adrienne's process is worth every minute as these simply sweet cupcakes achieve a depth of strawberry-ness that may be lacking from plain fresh or frozen berries. The purée made from the slow-roasted fruit is used in both the cake batter and the icing, but the flavor really shines in the latter. Happily, the frosting recipe yields more than enough for a dozen cupcakes, so lay it on thick or eat it by the spoonful - either way, it's pink-hued bliss!
As for me, I have never been able to make sense of this "secret/revealed’ distinction concerning God’s will, because the "secret will" doesn’t seem to be so much of a secret. It seems as though this so-called "secret" will is partly revealed as the (Calvinistic) quotations from Romans 9 make evident. Since it is revealed, it seems to undermine the appropriateness hoping for the attitudes of God in the so-called "revealed will" (everyone being saved, and so forth) to be fully realized. A comment from someone named Bill brings this up:
I've been having a play this morning with some new papers that I brought the other day, they are the new colection from Papermania called Lincoln Linen, I don't buy their paper that often these days but I did fall in love with this colour scheme and they went perfectly with this image from Saturated Canary which I had coloured in with Prismas.....using mostly the French greys (scrummy colours) and the flesh colors, how sweet is that bunny, just loving this image. I did get the Papermania goody bag this time as they are such good value because it included the paper, ribbons, buttons, flowers, brads and other bits n' bobs which are in the same collection.
Robert Moss, the director of recently formed not for profit Off and Off Off Broadway theater company called Playwrights Horizons, which was losing its performance space at the Y on 51st Street and 8th Avenue because the Y was consolidating branches, desperately needed space for his planned productions. He heard about the newly vacant burlesque theater and inquired about renting space there. Although he could only pay a fraction of the rent that the burlesque was paying the landlord Irving Maidman agreed on a trial basis to permit him to move in. Maidman some years earlier had thought of trying to use the space for Off Broadway theater productions. That he produced but his plays were disastrous flops (he became called “No Hit Maidman”) and he became convinced that audiences wouldn’t go to Ninth and Tenth Avenue on 42nd Street. Moss would prove him wrong.
Will had changed. The moldy skin Sam had found so disgusting now lay taut against his face. His nose, still misshapen, was no longer crumbling, and his hands were whole. The monk's outfit looked crisp and new, the rope tied smartly around his waist. A pleasant aroma like fresh lemon permeated the air.
“The people who lose their jobs through no fault of their own as a result of huge credit crunch losses – they are being punished. “
On September 15, the article said: Mr. Ratner, whose company is the development partner for the new Midtown headquarters of The New York Times Company, will be building a new and larger railyard to the west at an estimated cost of $182 million, Mr. Pally said... (It's not clear whether Pally actually used the term "west" or whether he simply mentioned a new railyard. There are some parentheticals packed into that paraphrased sentence--I'm certain Pally didn't mention the Ratner-Times connection.)
But if I may use the word with a different meaning, I think there is prayer which is not a looking to another for help; it is a continued alertness of mind, an awakened state in which you understand for yourself. In that state of prayer you know the cause of suffering, the cause of confusion, the cause of a problem. Most of us, when we have a problem, immediately seek a solution. When we find a solution we think that we have solved the problem, but we have not. We have only escaped from it. Prayer, in the conventional meaning of the word, is thus an escape. But real prayer, I feel, is action with awakened interest in life.
"Stop fidgeting. I know it's not comfortable, but it's only another moment."
It was my birthday last weekend and it is customary for any birthday girl to take cakes to work. I fully intended to make my own but ran out of time so bought some cupcakes for Sainsbury’s.
Fun Fact: Unlike in the movie The Lion King, it is unknown if they can breakout in song and dance at a moment’s notice.
That's all I have for this morning, but I hope to see you this evening at the MFT Release Party and the Blog Hop & Shop!! I'll have two more creations to show you, and I'm So EXCITED I can hardly wait!!! :)
But to best remember Mick Ronson, I want you to play ‘Moonage Daydream’ from Ziggy Stardust right now.
Which I found rather ironic, because I think I might have eaten so many of these addictive little morsels that I no longer fit into my real jeans.
You’re a slave to money then you die /
5. Help stop the Little League arms race. Kids’ sports are becoming ridiculously structured and competitive. What happened to playing baseball because it’s fun? We are systematically creating races out of things that ought to be a journey. We know that success isn’t about simply running faster than everyone else in some predetermined direction. Yet the message we are sending from birth is that if you don’t make the traveling soccer team or get into the “right” school, then you will somehow finish life with fewer points than everyone else. That’s not right. You’ll never read the following obituary: “Bob Smith died yesterday at the age of 74. He finished life in 186th place.”
in something.”
Click -’Programmes’ on the right side of the next page.
This one looks a bit patchy in the photo, but it looked fine in person (ugh, frustration!). I used the gold liner to brighten things up a bit, and to give it a more, er, festive spin.
‘Twas quenching a dozen blue-flies’ thirst
A few months ago, I had a little run in with the manager at my local Total Wine and More. You might remembe that, I wrote a post a about it. Since I've been catching everyone up on some old posts, I figured it was about time to catch you up on this one.
This past weekend I did some assessment of my ideal garden as we are coming into a new month – tomorrow!
So it has indeed been a good while, but it has been some happy times. Along with lots of hard work. Writing is re-writing isn’t it?
Three lines of evidence support a role for the virus in PBC.
The purpose of the Small Brewers Caucus is to provide Members of Congress and their staff an opportunity to learn about activities of the American craft brewing community, which includes over 1,500 small and independent American brewery businesses, and beer and homebrewing enthusiasts that participate in and contribute to local community activities and economies. The Small Brewers Caucus also offers opportunities to learn about the science and art of beer and brewing, the dynamics of running a small business as a brewery, the associated regulatory and societal issues and the value of craft beers and small brewing activities.
4. Giraffe print belt, $7.99 (spendy!)
Lisa our Lovely Ladybugs coordinator (and blogging genius!) has organised a very exciting blog hop!! Ladybug Crafts Ink's first blog hop!!! Whoop whoop! I'm only a teensy little bit excited (not! I'm jumping up and down!)
Derek's hosting a birthday party for Broadway wunderkind Lyle West (Nick Jonas) and Eileen ends up hitting up the kiddo for an investment when she can't unload her gorgeous Degas sketch (maybe too much commitment, darling!) because of a provenance/bill of sale issue. Lyle agrees if he can see a number so Tom gets brought in from a blind date his mom set him up on (who turns out to be pretty dreamy, Yay Mom!), they call in Michael Swift and Ivy is there of course and they do a swing-y number (the USO number) called "I Never Met a Wolf Who Didn't Love to Howl". After Ivy freaks out because Derek was doing some hands-on flirting with another guest and she's feeling all vulnerable; he tells her to put on her starlet panties and grow UP. Being a star isn't about feeling SAFE. I've been itching for somebody to tell off Little Miss Diva all episode and Derek's clearly been itching to do it. Yay!
1/3 cup orange marmalade
Michele
The man who had the glory by God from the beginning, when he was under the people on this earth, had to be recognised as the ‘man of God’ and as the one who could bring all those things which are in the writings of Moses and the prophets and in the Psalms about him, to be put into effect. (Luke 24:44)
From 1994 to 2004, I watched the Oscars. Religiously, reverently. In college I’d organize viewing parties and low-stakes betting pools. Once, in 1996, I even interrupted a family vacation to return to the hotel in time for the evening’s telecast. Pulp Fiction won Best Screenplay, but lost Best Picture to Forrest Gump, teaching me to which category to really pay attention to in the coming years.
Yes..I really do like to watch this after I put the kids to bed.. LOL
Anytime you and I question the schemes of the do-gooders, we’re denounced as being against their humanitarian goals. They say we’re always “against” things—we’re never “for” anything. Well, the trouble with our liberal friends is not that they’re ignorant; it’s just that they know so much that isn’t so. — President Ronald Reagan, speech to the American people, October 1964
Government has become farce. Yet still they're baffled as to why more and more of us can't be bothered to vote for any of them.
The annual report from the Department of Culture shows the same lack of interest in indicators. Most of the figures presented would become much more informative if they were related to the size of the population in the service area. This can be generalized: tables that focus on absolute numbers rather than on relationships between numbers, fail to release their full knowledge potential.
2 insensible
into our hearts
I had a similar issue. While I was pregnant I did a lot of experimental work. I knew I wanted to decorate jewelry boxes but I kept running out of ideas. Then my daughter was born and ideas flooded me. Being on maternity leave, I do a lot of magazine reading haha! So what I would suggest to you is to take a few days at least and just focus your thoughts on things that you like. Look at magazines, go on websites you like and book mark/tear out pages of anything and everything you like. When you have a decent collection, look it over and see what you find. I did the same and I noticed the commonalities in the things I liked and it helped me to identify my taste and style. Plus, focusing on how you find your shop to be kind of random sort of traps you. Put your shop aside and don’t even think about your items for a day or 2 and instead turn that energy into looking into new ideas and when you go back you’ll have clarity. At least I hope so because it worked for me! Good luck.
Is it being force-fed size 0 actresses and models in media?Are those images what helps us define our idea of beauty and what we should look like to be “beautiful”? Can you be beautiful without a muffin top?
Most people group lettuce into two broad categories, leaf and head, but according to the University of Illinois Extension there are five distinct types of lettuce. (Find a complete description of leaf, romaine, crisphead, butterhead and stem lettuces and recommended varieties for each on the Extension page.) No matter what type of lettuce you plant, it is important to know that all varieties prefer cool air and soil temperatures, with a few varieties willing to tolerate warm temps. Because of this preference, lettuce is a perfect choice for a northern gardener to include in their backyard garden! :D When mid to late summer approaches & temperatures start to head up to 80F+, most lettuce will bolt (shoot up a flower stalk), and become bitter to the taste. Consider extending the life of your spring crop by mulching the soil when temperatures start to rise. You may also want to plan your garden so that the lettuce is shaded by a larger plant or one of your vertical structures, for a vining crop like pole beans or cucumbers, when the mid-summer heat arrives.
On the beer front I opted for a few lower priced bottles as I had just blown my budget on the afforementioned bottles. I did grab some Weihenstephaner VITUS and Kristalweizen. These are 2 of my favorite beers of all time. While usually 3 bucks these ran 2.50 and are case worthy in my opinion.
You may not like foxes very much (I do), but you have to admit that they have their place in the world, the same as we do and therefore need to eat, just like us. Their numbers in the cities over here have increased quite dramatically in recent years and they are now quite a common sight on our urban streets.
I tore a page from an old book and distressed it with DI's. The main image, which is from the Flower Market stamp set, was masked off using a Post It note then stamped over with the music stamp from the Artistic Outpost Ephemeral Backgrounds stamp set. I then cut it out using a Nestability, watercoloured the image using re-inkers and then blended more DI around the edge.
People should be able to stand up for what they believe in. Even if it may appear wonky to others, they should be able to say so and be heard, without fear. But let's get back to the basics of unions.
1/2 teaspoon minced garlic
-The thought of spot reduction through repeated exercise of one body part has an enduring allure. However, your body doesn’t recognize your desire to lose your belly fat while keeping other areas robust. Exercise burns calories — but not always where you want calories to burn. Sit-ups and crunches still contribute meaningfully to your fitness program, but they cannot eliminate belly fat directly.
I tried to self-draft a dress, which didn't work out well. And what I thought would work for the use of the green really just didn't want to come together either. So, I made a cute green stripy skirt instead, and threw these cut up tees into my pile of UFOs.
These days, I'm proud to say...
By Danny Valentine
I don't hate many people, but him? Him I hate. And our President. And Karl Rove. That guy's a fucking dick. Speaking of dick, I hate Dick Cheney too. And Rumsfeld. Oh, and Celine Dion. She needs to choke on some horsefeed. And Paris Fucking Hilton. I wish she'd get a flesh-eating STD. And...
Over the next few years, each time we passed a baseball field with children playing, the Ladybug commented that she wanted to play baseball, but she knew that would have to wait until she was five years old.
My knee slipped a little further into my earhole, my hand gripped my arm more firmly, he leaned a little harder and - CrrrAACkK! Some small portion of my back clicked and clunked and cracked it's way back into position. My breath left my body in a huge whooshing gasp.
Don't forget you can still enter our competition on the post below to win a TGF Stamp!
According to Michael Hartnett, chief global equity strategist at Merrill Lynch Global Research, “Investor capitulation from risk assets is not yet visible despite higher cash levels and defensive rotation. Fears on global growth will need to rise further before hopes for QE3 can begin to be priced in.”
Rise up this mornin'
"The cats have been stealing my chew toys, shedding on my pillows, and clawing my suitcases. Their poor manners have forced me to set limits, so I used masking tape to divide the car's passenger area in half."Bibliophile's reaction: I thought he would love this one, because he's such a fan of geography. Unfortunately, the sarcasm was all a bit over his head at this point, and the text probably too lengthy (he is only 3 1/2). He didn't dislike it, though, and I hear that he and Daddy have read it together a bit also. I'd recommend it for slightly older children, and of course for cat and dog fans. I might give it another try with him by reading just one postcard at a time, and stopping to explain it to him.
Professor Calestous Juma
Now all eyes turn to the nomination of the new prime minister, which must be someone around whom Malians of various ideologies and affiliations can unite. My prediction, given Mali’s current political climate and frustration with its politicians, is that whomever Dioncounda names will be either an outsider or Ibrahim Boubacar Keita, a former prime minister and opposition party leader. Keita (or “IBK” as he’s known here) is one of the few major figures on Mali’s political scene today who was not co-opted by President Touré and his “consensus” approach. But IBK is also a presidential candidate (he was widely believed to have been cheated out of a spot in the second round of presidential elections in 2002), which may work against him.
artmarket
This time I traveled much smarter! We took my mom’s van with the big seat-less area, and I draped over the birth ball. Even when contractions hit (and they were getting stronger) I was fine to get through them. It was actually kind of a nice ride! And when we got there, I walked to the maternity ward, which was a nice change
Practice mindfulness. Use meditation to practice bringing your awareness over and over again to the present moment. While performing everyday tasks, such as washing dishes, doing laundry, or eating a meal, bring your full attention to the activity and notice every detail to improve your ability to remain in the present.
I must tell you as a final thought, that since my mother has died I haven’t had to take anti-depressants anymore. I really do feel good about myself. I am good enough, always have been. I just wish I could have found the map to this state of well being long before she died.
As we saw during the week when Eurostat released its economic statistics for the EU in 2011, some countries have been affected by the financial crisis more than others. At 108.2%Ireland has the third highest debt:GDP in the 27-member EU, after Greece and Italy. On a GNP basis which was not shown, we are no 2 after Greece. The betting is that Greece will have further defaults, as indicated by its sovereign bond rates, and eventually leave or be kicked out of the EuroZone even after the debt forgiveness this year. What are the prospects for Ireland?
I know Laura loved the 85mm. Jenny is quieter but I gathered she liked the 85mm too. It's kind of a built in personal space buffer...that 85mm.
Avoiding Self-Based Faith
Congratulations Louisiana State University. You made the news today. And you made it in a way that will do you proud with tens of millions of veterans and patriotic Americans all across the land and those serving their country overseas.
The use of Kegels to improve urinary incontinence in men has not been extensively studied, although many clinicians report improvement. One study found that after the removal of a cancerous prostate, men who performed Kegels twice a day regained bladder control faster than those who did not do the exercises.
Ellie Nash
The interesting thing about the pyroclastic deposits here is how small they are. In truth, they have a lot more in common with a dry-rock avalanche than what most volcanologists would consider a pyroclastic flow deposit. We are generally trained to look for poor sorting, with lots of pumice and ash, with channel filling morphologies, probably associated with some cross-bedded surge or well sorted fall deposits. These things are really quite different.
Otherwise a day in, rewriting the Finzi for minor corrections, and rewriting, time and again the eight minute speech for the Hungary debate at the LSE on Wednesday. This entails Skyping and ringing friends who can correct errors or point out faults.
To take a break from deciding which cardigan to pack—the pink or the yellow, or both?—I went out for dinner and ice cream with one of my dearest friends, Katie.
Before the show we went to this place called Iguanas which we saw on the show Man vs Food. the guy on the show had something called a Burritozilla which is 5 pound 18 inch burrito. I just had the regular super burrito and it was alright. I perfer the burritos from my "home" Mexican take out restaurant. But Iguanas was voted #67 on the Travel Channel's 101 Tastiest Places to Chow Down in the Nation. I also thought I would unlock a certain badge on foursquare by going there but apparently I need to go to three place that Man vs Food has been.
- Daddy in Chinese is "baba." Brielle started calling Alex Da and then Dada so we were confused when sometimes Brielle would walk up to either of us and say what we thought was "baba" with her arms reaching up. Then our guide saw her do it and said she is saying "bao bao" which means "hold me." :)
SCS had a great tutorial on this adorable card. I bought quite a bit of Valentine paper from the SU clearance rack and used it for these cards. I used a heart from our new Framelits to cut the Heart for the center!
9.) What trend do you most look forward to for Spring 2012?
On top of the earth
Nixon GS, Helsby CA, Gordon H, Hytten FE, Rensen CE. Pregnancy outcome in female dentists. Br Dent J 1979; 146: 39-42.
~ Children are F.A.S.T.!!
Me: (getting irritated) well wait in bed I need a shower
At three o’clock, I prayed prostrate, in the form of a cross, for the whole world. Jesus’ mortal life was coming to an end. I heard His seven words; then He looked at me and said, Beloved daughter of My Heart, you are My solace amidst terrible torments (Diary, 1058). –Today’s Excerpt from Divine Mercy Minutes with Jesus
I hit the water and I’m heading under.
I have finally accepted that the Nice project is highly unlikely to be finished by the deadline that I set myself which was the best part of four months longer than the original one.
THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN
Anyway, when we pulled up the other night, I immediately saw a disturbing silhouette, and instinctively knew that it was the man-boy. So yeah. We went someplace else.
MERCURY RETROGRADE by Mary Robinette Kowal
Now, I should clarify here, it's actually not the book itself that's the problem, I like it, I like its content, I like its concept - in fact to get that many world class brewers in one book from Schneider to Lost Abbey, Dogfish Head to Cantillon and Russian River to Fuller's is a truly wondrous thing.
I feel bad for my son, but he needs to take action. My son has six months left on this lease. Sure, he could break it and ruin his credit for many years-- they could sue him for $2000.00 to break the lease....
...And now I am placing myself on a shopping ban.
Espresso Stout: This was an interesting, very strong beer. It really gave you the full on, intense, espresso experience. It was explained that this is because it is made with a heavy dose of Italian coffee beans. An interesting comparison was made to the Flying Dog version which uses Ethiopian beans for a much smoother taste.
5.Loshon hora cannot be communicated in any manner, be it through writing, body language or verbal hints.
Jessica Gonacha
All conversations fended off by high cast-iron fences
2:30pm CST
Painters and artists in many media, such as oil, acrylic and watercolor paint, will often add a colorful glaze of paint to their works. This final touch can make dramatic color shifts and realignments in the painting.
My eyes are on all their ways;
There are several specialty Italian stores that sell Burrata. There's also a fromagerie located here that is selling it at the moment:
Source: Finished copy provided by publisher
i got rid of...
One of the people at dinner had been the Group Creative Director on Dunkin'. He is still marginally in the industry. The schticky sort of work he was best at has fallen out of favor and his style has come be regarded as too old to cut the mustard. He is now making a living freelancing at health care agencies.
The tomato plants that were ridiculously over-producing just a few weeks ago have slowed production considerably over the past weeke They are beginning to show signs of blight–a strong signal that the end is near.
While running away from a seven year old boy who keeps trying to snap my bra, I yell, "You know why they call it Victoria's Secret? Because YOU'RE not suppose to KNOW about it! So stop it!"
I actually went to a bookstore to find something to read while I was waiting for my Mom. I was going to buy a book on Physics for beginners, I want to explore something new.
30. “Capitol City” by Wilco
Sift together the flour, cornmeal, baking powder, and salt.
Sigma UK has announced the new 19mm and 30mm f/2.8 lenses for Sony and Micro Four Thirds cameras are to carry a SRP of £169.99 inc. VAT and will be available immediately.
Karen and I were hungry, so we went and had Vietnamese food at a restaurant up the road. It was EXCELLENT, some of the best I have ever had. I am a sucker for Vietnamese food. Yum. We walked around for a bit, then went back to the Barderij.
Pain literally sucks your energy away, and that can be very debilitating and depressing.
"You bet I will."
Anyone else been learning any lessons lately? How about success stories when something didn't work out so great the first time, yet was a soaring success because you didn't give up right away?
I recently got the chance to talk to Lee Craven about his role in ‘Turnout’. Here, Lee talks about what it was like working with the cast and crew on-set and which three people he would invite to dinner…
CAROLINE
But what if the problem is the model itself? Then no amount of tweaking will make the kinds of big differences people are hoping for.
Writing assignment: a brief, elemental narrative description of what each of us think happened as we worked out our contract and code of respect. Analysis & discussion—were our terms for Elements of Power useful. How might we revise them.
- Salmon and lemon mousse served in a miniature vol-au-vent case with a rolled cucumber garnish
Another new show to preview this Spring season is GCB, also known as Good Christian Bitches or Good Christian Belles whichever is more appropriate for the current viewing audience. This show was highly advertised using Kristen Chenoweth as a figurehead of the show. The show takes place in Dallas, Texas and stars Leslie Bibb as Amanda Vaughn who used to be a high-school “Queen Bee” and would end up being widowed when he husband, who is cheating on her dies from a car accident. Bibb’s character moves back to Texas with her mother and sees the people who she terrorized in high school. Among the people who Bibb’s character mocked in high school is Kristen Chenoweth’s character Carlene Cockburn. Chenoweth’s character generally watches over the neighborhood and is generally a snoop. She becomes greatly interested in Amanda Vaughn since she has moved back to Texas. Between these two feuding characters there are a couple which features a gay man and his “wife”, a woman who “does not make enough to live in their society”, and a feuding husband and wife. If you are interested in watching GCB tune into the ABC channel on Sundays at 10 pm Eastern/9 pm Central.
I peeked around the corner of the desk. White hair puffed on the top of a head like a cloud. The professor. He shuffled to the stage in full academic robes. His knees cracked, and the sound echoed through the room.
Measuring spoons
With the sun gone, the north-easterly gained a sharp edge and I snuggled into my sleeping bag. The fabric of my Big Agnes Three Wire Bivy snapped and crackled in the wind and sleep was fitful at best. I did sleep, though, as glances at my watch confirmed that hours had passed when it only felt like minutes.
Needless to say I’m nervous about doing the best I can in an environment like this, but it’ll hopefully be a lot of fun and I’m anxious to see what sort of reactions I get to the coverage I create. But ultimately I’m really excited about being served a real test of my mettle in a big way, and I’ll probably try and find a little time to blog personally about my experiences in Germany outwith doing work for EA.
1 bag of frozen corn
Speak the word of God to one another. Build the body in love. Ephesians 4:15-16
A reader and fan of my blog asked me to share with my readers their experience at Joshua Tree National Park in California. Thank you!
It said sweet things
“Yay – Yay!” Baekhyun hop in Chanyeol’s back with a bright face *such a troublesome baby*
The cover design here is by London firm Two Associates, and as with the Richard Price book and the way its cover resembles those adorning other contemporary crime novels, the cover of Never Let Me Go is very much what we expect a literary novel to look like. Which is to say, it conforms to our current expectations – formed by countless other books and indeed films, film posters, adverts, and so on – of what a literary novel should look like: a blurry image, an elegant font. And like the Price novel, it almost certainly plays to those expectations. After all, one of the purposes of a book cover is to be attractive to, and therefore to attract, the sort of person who might be interested in that book; to get you, the book-buyer, to pick up and buy that book. So in that sense, playing to the gallery is perfectly understandable: Samaritan looks like a crime novel – looks like novels by the aforementioned Pelecanos, Lehane, and even, say, Ian Rankin, and consequently might well attract anyone interested in crime novels or the works of messers Pelecanos et al; and the Ishiguro conforms to the stereotype of what a so-called literary novel should look like, right down to the faux staining and distressing (this isn't a notably scruffy copy; those scuffs and marks you can see on the jacket are a design choice), and would therefore quite conceivably attract a bookworm of a literary bent.
“I’m not sure I completely buy into this exilic notion that you have to leave a place to write about it,” says the author. “At the last stanza of TS Eliot’s Little Gidding, he says, “And the end of all our exploring / Will be to arrive where we started / And know the place for the first time.” Perhaps, but William Faulkner did a pretty good job writing about Oxford, Mississippi while living in Oxford, Mississippi his entire life.”
A place to start if you are travelling to Provence...
'Lick the pencil' we might have called him
4. Remember that justice commands you to love one that has forsaken all the world for you. One who is contented to be the companion of your labours and sufferings, and be a sharer in all things with you, and that MUST be your companion until death. (4)
I am a primary school teacher who specialises in drama and I also run my own children’s drama company. I’ve always worked with children and I’m lucky that my work, for the most part, has been very creative and satisfying. I only started writing about five years ago but I have always been passionate about children reading and writing and loving books. I am married and I have two boys (who luckily both LOVE reading) but I have to say that all members of my family get a slightly glazed look in their eyes whenever I mention the B word (which is quite often!)
Then at 3 a.m. one of the partygoers thought it would be cool to spin his tires in the street. The squealing was so loud even Dad, with no hearing aids on, got out of bed. Bro called the cops, but a squad car didn’t show up until after Squealing Tires took off. I did hear our next-door neighbor, who is sort of a curmudgeon himself, go out and yell at the driver. I was worried he’d get shot, which is a too-common occurrence out here: instead I heard him slam the door of his house and scream at the top of his lungs at his wife. (Ooh, that’s right, spread the misery around. ) Then it was quiet until just before 7 a.m., when the tenant, a single mom with two little boys, began screaming at her boyfriend in her front yard. Someone else must have called the police then, because a squad car came roaring up and two officers separated the combatants. No one was arrested, but after the cops left, Boyfriend jumped in his car and took off, tires squealing. It was a bad night for rubber. Also a bad night for sleeping: I crawled out of bed around 9:30 because the phone began to ring—it was one of my parents’ friends, speaking in Japanese, so I had to get Mom out of bed to talk to her. Mom slept blissfully through everything. It must be one of the blessings of dementia to not be conscious of stuff like loud parties and neighborhood scuffles. I on the other hand walked through Saturday like a zombie. I couldn’t take a nap because there was too much to do, but not even four cups of coffee could cut through the fog.
When drafting a biotech case it is important to think carefully about the claim scope. Whilst broad claims are often appropriate, claims which are too broad can be detrimental to a case. Sometimes it is a case of striking the correct balance between inventive step and sufficiency to arrive at a scope which is credible from the available data. Essentially the claims as initially drafted should come across as a reasonable extrapolation from the Examples and with a clear distinction over the prior art. Whilst amendments are of course possible later, it is advantageous to have an initial position which is credible and potentially defensible.
Include a Sentiment
So, it is in this culture of Roman manliness, Paul writes the shocking instruction to husbands.
“I left the tulle there all winter and it blew all over the neighborhood,” Faler said.
us to scorn.
Confessions will start this Friday May 4th! COACC will continue every Friday until…there isn’t any more confessions.
Second, "lactation failure" literally means "inability to produce adequate milk volume" which is exactly my problem.
McMahan, 50, of Plough Court , Broomfield , was arrested and failed a breathalyser test, giving a reading of 167 microgrammes of alcohol in 100ml of breath – the legal limit is just 35.
you will improve your photo composition.
Father's birthplace: Austria
But I have the current advantage of living in a county where I get to feel superior.
Soul wanders in California
Manuela (no label)
When this column takes a whiskey producer to task it’s usually over a mistruth, not a clear untruth. Whiskey marketers usually won’t lie outright, but they can be misleading as hell. Everybody does it, large and small, distillers and non-distiller producers.
She holds up her hand and opens it; and in her palm is a wild daisy.
You never quietly watch injustices being done to others but instead you boldly stand beside those who need your support and show others the right way to treat people. You are such an asset to humanity!
Certain (ahem) frightening qualities
4. Creates a 14% flat rate non-essential ‘new items only’ sales tax revenue for the government. In other words food and medicine will not be taxed; nor will used items such as old homes.
Thanks mom for not only telling me how to be a godly wife and mom, but showing me. I will forever be in your debt.
We've had wonderful feedback so far and I can't wait to show you all through our new rooms. They are truly beautiful and probably the most spectacular spaces we have ever created at the store!!
Doctor: *has heart attack* “WHAT? BUT HOW WILL YOU GET A BETTER JOB?”
100% worth it cause we are going to change lives!!!!
I don't like people I don't know talking to me in public places for more than a few seconds. If I initiate the contact, it's a different story.
Comfortably Numb 11'44
Hoards of Cabal vessels on earth bases and on the moon have retreated and re-located to underground bases in the Soviet Union. Vladimir Putin has welcomed them with open arms.
But taking advantage of this upswing in American manufacturing hinges on finding skilled labor to keep up with production. If your talent pool has dried up, consider quenching unemployment by arming new workers with industrial workforce training.
1/4 minced garlic
The cup is filled part of the way with the dog's genetic endowment. In the case of fearfulness, a dog with a low genetic predisposition for being fearful would have only a tiny bit of their cup filled. A dog with a high genetic predisposition for being fearful would have a LOT of their cup filled.
Miles 3-4
These are my Prepare shoes, from the Guide family, made by Fluevog*. They are extremely polarizing shoes: people either love them or think they are the weirdest things ever. They were called "Smurf Shoes" and Dutch clogs at work today - I had a blast showing them off. They were supremely comfortable (seriously, like wearing flats), even when I went out to do some errands mid-day.
Here he co-wrote several technical reports on a range of subjects: from web 2.0, to RFID technology and other matters concerning 'global governance'.
Published in 1847 under the pseudonym Currer Bell, Jane Eyre enthralled and appalled readers with its passionate, defiant heroine. It remains a novel of unparalleled narrative grip, vivid imagery and naked emotional power.
“But…but…”
as proof of identity (passport, driver’s lizence or national ID document)
JBL Marine Speakers
This weather is amazing, chickens.
While the film includes numerous musical interludes, including one song performed by Louis Prima, the popular theme song from the show itself is not used. However, plots from several episodes of the TV series are used, including an episode in which Fred becomes involved in a spy caper spoofing Goldfinger, and another in which he encounters JL Gotrocks, the world's richest man, and his exact double.
Equally people have suggested the teams could develop a quicker method for altering the map at the first stop, rather than plugging a laptop in. I guess this is a possibility, assuming the SECU supports any alternative method. But it should be pointed out that the aim of this rule is to stop the aggressive hot blown qualifying maps, which will be restricted to the point of ineffectiveness at the next race (Silverstone), so it’s unlikely any teams would risk any literal interpretation of this rule. If indeed there isn’t already any additional info available to the teams or direction form Charlie Whiting that isn’t public that prohibits this.
This won’t be the last time that I’ll be doing a stop motion project! Maybe I’ll put up some of the other plot ideas I’ve had – after all, there is much more mischief that knitting needles can get into. As for today’s post, I’ll leave this one up for a while so Day 6 will probably be posted late tomorrow. In the meantime, check out the other creative posts out there, by googling today’s code 3KCBWDAY5. Until tomorrow!
after all, i'm still terrified that i'll need you all again, worryingly soon.
“I came with this,” said Hornmel emptying his pocket into his hand and show his three tin pieces proudly. That would be enough money to buy one chicken leg in Hobbington, thought Hermel to himself with a shrug.
and as you see below, Georges Le Soq, my rotton French sock monkey, is like
Well my lovelies, it has been one whirlwind of a dating week. I successfully completed six dates in eight days and visited not only brand new parts of the city, but made some pretty wonderful connections as well. What better way to celebrate leg one of this journey (we're 1/4 of the way there!) before I dive back into lawyer land than with a visit to the George Washington Bridge.
As a key step to global food security and sustainable intensification of agriculture. Some people think agriculture, to be sustainable, has to be small. It can’t be small and feed 10 billion people. Genetically enhanced crops are helping to build soil quality while increasing yields. Virus-resistant cassava, a subsistence crop, is being field-trialed in Uganda, Nigeria, and Kenya. If we are successful, their food security will have been helped by the Danforth Center.
by visiting thme in stores and through their pictures.
All bodies affect bodies below
Martin DeMeo, 47, Farmingville, N.Y.
"What the hell are you doing, Samson?” Ricky asked.
When Emlyn Chand, author and publicist, introduced her year-long challenge for folks to re-visit the books they loved in childhood that made them love reading, http://emlynchand.com , I thought back not only to my own favorite books as a child, but to my children’s favorite books as well.
Prior to starting their Herbalife business, Gudelia and Justino worked long hours and many years for other people. “I thought I had achieved my dream,” Justino says, “but working for someone else really wasn’t it.” Of their first Herbalife Opportunity Meeting, Justino recalls, “I realized then it was the opportunity we were looking for to make more money and have a better life for our family.”
So ultimately today my baby girl couldn’t dress, middle girl wanted to spend the morning sat on the toilet doing nothing, and big girl decided she’d like to just be naughty.
These moments aren't always as sad as you might expect. Whilst their father is clearly a man of brutish strength and quick temper he also has moments when he shows not just tenderness but insight too. When he takes his youngest son on an errand up to Niagra on one occasion he leaves him alone in a museum of curiosities for a while. Our narrator watches a film about the daredevils who tossed themselves over the famous Falls in barrels. Alone in the room and seeing the film projection on his body he begins to do a dance for himself and only notices his father watching from the doorway when he finishes. His father says nothing until many hours later when they pull onto the road that will lead them to their home.
4 Tbsp water
Mark said that people wonder why he took out Kane and Big Show, and put Sheamus through a barricade. 15 years of no respect, 15 years of not being a Number One Contender, 15 years of not being a World Heavyweight Champion, yet he does that to get noticed. Randy Orton will join Mark Henry’s Hall of Pain this Sunday.
With UNDP in association with UNAIDS, UNIFEM SARO, ICRW, Inform – Sri Lanka, Centre for Women’s Research; CENWOR – Sri Lanka; Siyath Foundation, Sri Lanka; FWLD, Sri Lanka; Lawyers Collective, India; PWN+, India; Vimochana, India; Milana, India; Abhaya Action Aid, India; Lanka Plus, Sri Lanka; El Taller International
Description: Improvements include: resurfacing WIS 66 (formerly County P); resurfacing WIS 34 between Edgewood Place and the WIS 34/66 intersection; and replacing four bridges on WIS 66. Crews will also install rumble strips along the centerline of WIS 66 (Portage County line to County HH) and along the centerline and shoulders of WIS 66 (WIS 34 to the Portage County line). The rumble strips are designed to reduce run-off-the road crashes.
Nothing To Do With Love
Let's see what the Design Team has up their sleeve.
I was hovering close to the edge, but I was pulled over. Thank God for that.
In the nine years that followed the Hijrah to Madinah (where permission was given to fight) the Prophet (Sallallahu Alaihi Wasallam) personally led 28 military campaigns, and during the same period the Companions (ra) embarked on another 51 military campaigns.
'Don't be a muppet,' said Solemn. 'There's only one destination.'
She was as magnificent as he had expected: the Statue of Liberty. She’d been refurbished to look the way she had in the golden age of immigration. Even in those distant days the copper had already been green with age, but that somehow only added to the majesty. For myriad thousands of immigrant men, women, and children, her towering visage was the first they saw of America, that famous land of the free.
not just hang out
Please take a moment to view Lindsay's video below and you will better understand the title of this post. Then I ask that you please take some time to pray about how you can help these two precious little girls. Whether you can reach out financially or in prayer, or both... I just ask that you take a moment to see this video and visit this blog that she and Hannah have created to spread the word and help these two beautiful little girls, in hopes that they too will get their life-saving surgeries and have true hope for a future. This is a new blog, so there are only a few posts, but I encourage you to start from the beginning and read them all... you will be glad you did!
You will never pay as much for insurance as it will provide. Let me repeat for emphasis: You will never pay as much for insurance as it will provide. Plus the death benefit is 100% tax- free.
In some cases, it was only necessary for a 23-member panel (functioning as a Lesser Sanhedrin) to convene. In general, the full panel of 71 judges was only convened on matters of national significance or in the event that the 23-member panel could not reach a conclusive verdic
Andrea is headed off to college in another state next week so they really just wanted to spend time with each other as a family and enjoy some old friends along the way.
Oh shit. I wandered onto the nekkid beach. I pretended like I was cool and gathered my stuff and just sort of wandered off. Quickly. Yeah, yeah, I've lived in Europe for almost 8 years now, but I still don't do naked beaches. I might see someone I KNOW and then what? No thank you.
Well, the title of this post sounds like the most boring entry you could possibly read! While the title sounds incredibly boring, the content is anything but boring. Our reading lessons for the week have to do with nonfiction books about animals.
India did perform well in Asian games and Commonwealth games, but on a global scale, the achievements are minimalistic. India’s performance in the Olympics – lesser said the better. We have participated in 22 Olympic Games and we have won only 20 medals in all. That’s way too less for a country with population exceeding a billion people. On a population to medals ratio, India is first from the bottom.
I really like Thorne's approach to trying out a new recipe or ingredient. Once something strikes his fancy, he's on an adventure to study it and make it his own. He reads about it extensively, cooks up many variations and then presents the reader with his findings. Whether it's hunting for the perfect meatball, simple pasta dishes, black beans and rice, pea soup or the best thing to do with a bounty of summer raspberries, there's lots of research and development in the Thorne kitchen and library and plenty of references offered up for further exploration.
03.Babylon Ba-bye 04:14
John Llewellyn Probert – Rings Around The Roses
Warmer and deeper than the Orient sand
I love how major sporting events like the World Cup and Olympics bring people together of all nationalities, colours, races, cultures and religions.
Me: “I’ve got plenty of time for a novel, let me just get better with some short stories first.”
The 2012 Passat TDI models have a 2.0-liter turbocharged diesel four-cylinder engine rated 140 horsepower and 236 pound-feet of torque. Turbodiesels renowned for torque and fuel economy and no other midsize car sold in the United States offered one. In a 2012 Passat, this machine runs a bit more rugged than the 2.5 five-cylinder, but responded with a little more muscle, especially at highway speeds passing or merging situations.
And way cheaper than any I’ve seen anywhere.
Network: Hallmark Channel
In the end, it’s about how much you believe in your own vision of the world. If you don’t really believe in something then neither will your reader, no matter how clever you are with words.
a motley crowd of hired
Final total = $0.30 + tax
The interviews consisted almost entirely of the female interviewer and stars saying to each other "Oh my God! You look gorgeous!" Plus those strange contemporary constructions like "I'm loving the shoes!" (instead of "I love your shoes").
I would like to see that all change...if for no other reason, than to have our parents believe that all that THEY did and sacrificed to make our lives better...were not in vain. I think that's reason enough.
Contestant: I don’t know, I wasn’t watching it then.
to be the subject of the Glamorous Review this week.
my love for this girl grows more by the day. also please note how hair-crush-worthy her barnet is.
In a hangar at the U.S. base, Gen. John Allen, ISAF commander, gave a rousing warm up talk to about 3000 service members, most of them Army from the 1st Infantry Division.
Rooftops at sunset and in the morning light.
Then, very gradually, these other people began to appear on my drawing paper, and I knew right away that they were my relatives. They were my uncles and aunts. It wasn't that they were monstrous people; it was simply that I didn't care for them when I was a child because they were rude, and because they ruined every Sunday, and because they ate all our food. They pinched us and poked us and said those tedious, boring things that grown-ups say, and my sister and my brother and I sat there in total dismay and rage. The only fun we had was later, giggling over their grotesque faces—the huge noses, the spiraling hair pouring out of the wrong places. So I know who those "wild things" are. They are my Jewish relatives.
Space is available for advertisement in my sidebar. Your ad will show up on any page---my home page and on individual blog posts. I prefer the 125x125px size, but if you have a different sized banner, feel free to ask me about it.
Angela Savage's debut novel, Behind the Night Bazaar was nominated for a Ned Kelly Award. She is currently working on book number 2. You can visit Angela Savage at her website.
Did you feel like your cup was full or empty this week? What is Jesus inviting you to do with the cup?
The formula was decent, though a little on the thick side. I'll probably add a bit of thinner to it before using it again, but overall it was easy to control and I had full coverage in two coats. I didn't have any staining upon removal either, which is always nice with a blue this bold.
Along the sticky strands.
She is just as large in mast and hull and spar as she was when she left my side
Well, lying is lying, period. And my personal belief is that the truth should be told no matter what. And sometimes it’s painful. Lies are painful, too. Much more painful than the truth in my opinion.
I’m Not Religious, But I’m Spiritual
Michael L. Brown
...for my FAMILY, who's always been there for me, even when I'm bordering on stepping over Insanityville, and for understanding my long periods of silence because I'm thinking, plotting, and hacking away at the keyboard for many, many hours.
“Some have approached the Hawks with information and the Hawks have told them to wait until they finalise their investigation,” said the official. During their investigation, the Hawks apparently found a lot of companies registered under Malema and his associates, with “big money moving from one account to another”.
Yesterday morning we attended a farewell playdate for Landon, organized by some moms in his class. I'm so glad they thought of it. It was low key and simple, with fruit and juice and crackers, and a perfect way to spend some time with these parents we've been seeing at drop-off and pick-up and a million birthday parties over the past 3 years. We chatted and laughed and let the kids run amok under our intermittent supervision.
“For people like that, the history, the nostalgia and the sentiment is absolutely immense,” he said. “A lot of them are aware it might be the last time in their lives that they'll see it.”
All that stuff. She was convinced antibiotics were the forbidden fruit, so she
Sponsorships for this tournament are available. For information, call 702-968-2055.
So have sweet dreams my babies, let the magical day begin!
Love to all of you – keep smiling and HAPPY SPRINGTIME FINALLY HOLY GOSH.
Chapter 2 - A Can of Corn
In forest shadows a tall young Beech
And I chanting your name,
Un-wad your paper carefully. Now, apply a bit of hot glue to your backing strip, adhere the end of your patterned paper strip, and start pleating. I use kind of a box pleat method, but you can also accordian pleat your paper. Adhere with the hot glue as you proceed. Give the paper a little push into the hot glue (careful though! I've burned myself once or twice when I've been in a hurry) to make sure the pleat "catches".
So, in my Past Layouts section, I have only ever described the first 3 backgrounds I ever had. Simply because I couldn't ever find them again.
CHEESY CHICKEN & SALSA SKILLET
We’ll go back again and tour the grounds. On this visit we mostly stayed in the air-conditioned interpretive center.
This dish makes a great accompaniment to any meat or fish dish.
I did almost buy World War Z but managed to restrain myself.
Before I moved to Paraguay I (mentally, emotionally, physically, etc.) prepared myself that I would not see a lot of rain for a very long time. Whoever has lived in Paraguay these last couple of years, knows what I am talking about. There was literally a drought. Whenever the dark clouds would gather, a strong wind coming south would come and blow everything away before the raindrops even had a chance.
KAUFMAN - "Or cramming in sex, or car chases, or guns. Or characters learning profound life lessons. Or characters growing or characters changing or characters learning to like each other or characters overcoming obstacles to succeed in the end. Y'know ? Movie shit."
When I was trying to decide what list to write today, it occurred to me that I have never done a list of my favorite non-holiday movies. How could this be? So here it is, my top ten favorite movies. Since I have separate lists of Halloween and Christmas movies, I won't include any of those this time around.
The last letter came, it was tear-stained and brown.
My mouth is watering just as I write this part. I know many of us have had a hard time trying to find the right box of puris for pani-puri at the indian store. By “right box” I mean a box with the least amount of broken puris. We don’t even get close to thinking about how old they are and what oil they were fried in.
02 Soul Thing
Horn shape: by Teesha Moore.com
5. Tasks that pushed well outside my comfort zone were always followed by tasks well within that zone. Robert was kind to us, as we often fail to be to ourselves.
- How has Cabaret changed in your time there?
apathy bland
Last, but not least, the card folds flat for mailing:
Najib may decide to pay attention to the exponentially growing number of protestors and introduce real reform in Malaysia in the little time his premiership has left. Or he may continue with his faux reforms.
Hope everyone is having/had a wonderful weekend! After having a very mild December, winter decided to show up this weekend. It is very cold today and the ground is finally covered with a white fluffy blanket. I guess that goes well with the project I have made for today!
Back to The Bull Hotel in the High Street for tea, with Adam and Tania – which morphed into an early sarnie supper before the second highlight of the festival, A L Kennedy on stage – and said supper in turn morphed into early sarnie supper with said A L K. It was great to meet her properly – to be able to ask questions like ‘So what did the Austrians/German audiences think of ‘Day’?’ and stuff like that.
We need to make the players and their teams responsible for what they do, both during games and afterwards, until they get home. After that, players are on their own, with some exceptions as to ”wider ranging” contractual concerns.
Minus 2 KARMIC POINTS!
One investment property has recently fallen through -- another short sale because we apparently hate ourselves -- and just last night we wrote an offer for an old Victorian that makes The Goddamn House look like pristine clean perfection. There are currently 26 offers on the Victorian, so perhaps our only chance of getting it is to seduce the seller, which is a bank, so that may be uncomfortable.
It's not a fun, fast, cozy read. It was gripping and intense. It's not a stereotypical YA paranormal novel, in which beautiful, extraordinary people fall in love, and you know they'll end up together. Matthew and Ariel are, indeed, extraordinary, and not unbeautiful, but their painfully fragile relationship is not an escapist fantasy. If you are looking for a memorable, though-provoking read, give this one a try.
To download the files, just click the captions under each photo!
31.94 - Kerron Clement
When we met creators Zach Horvath and Travis Huse and learned about the idea they were putting together, it seemed like the perfect opportunity to encourage collaboration within the Austin community. The concept is centered around showing people what they can produce together through collaboration, and the execution worked perfectly in that regard. Zach and Travis put the Big Ass Mission best: “Big Ass Canvas is a cooperative art experiment that wants to bring in all the people of Austin…When great people come together with a common goal and a common focus…forget about it. It’s game over.”
Let's talk about some of the new soaps I have coming out for the Halloween/Fall season. :) I am officially ready to gag over all the cinnamon-y, pumpkin-y smells around here!
Background: Black and White fabric
Had it transpired in a late night dive, the performance would almost certainly have been one of my favorite gigs of 2012. Even in the unlikely setting, it was one of the most rewarding lunch hours I've enjoyed in ages.
And it is a post-inspiring spot too -- upcoming posts with include Casey's Rubber Stamp Heaven
** Blog photo of Cole on a tractor at the PA Farm Show – January 14, 2012.
(i was still sleeping, because i'm off today thankGOD)
For foods we just went with things my little girl liked and a few things that our family liked to noche on.
I WANT to qualify for Boston; I never thought I would say that, and I know it’s going to be hard work and will require a lot of sacrifice on my part but I feel I’m ready to step back into the shoes of a marathon runner; albeit slowly, but I’m going to step into them. One step at a time, right?
… and here she comes…
Use this code through this Sunday to get a fantastic discount on what are
I Corinthians 13:1-3
Many of us as parents want to help our kids be "good" people and have "good" jobs and have "good" families and really just be "good" people. So how do we do that? How do we help our kids be "good?"
Since when did "I'll call you tonight" become "I think I'll fall off the face of the planet and leave you hanging, thinking about what you may have done wrong while I reveal in the fact that your ego was taken down a notch or two"?
The act of lying and its consequences are inevitable. It will catch up with you if you don’t make amends now. Lying equals not trusting and loving yourself enough, to tell the truth.
The second Kith’takharos adventure. (I’m using the Savage Worlds versions, by the way.)
as we wait for our morning bus,
The listed building just south of Pigalle (or SoPi, if you're a PR-type) provides a grand backdrop for swanky drinks with its painted ceilings, stucco cherubs and neo-classical columns. The gilded mirrors, grand piano and the low lighting only add to the romance of the place and yet the vibe is laidback, welcoming in a young fun crowd with evenings as diverse as book club to violin concerts or fashion week parties.
It's fun to purchase something this way: a bit subversive, more personal, and with the special kick that comes from knowing that in some small way you are supporting a real person and her passion for creation. In this case, hot damn! – a member of the Secret Society of Dirty Sisters, helping me clean up that sink full of dishes. (These dish cloths, which come in many other colors, would also make great face cloths.) That's my consumer advisory for the day, with this disclaimer: No catalogs were created in the marketing of these items.
Among picture book writers I admire Mary Ann Hoberman, Doreen Cronin, Jane O’Connor, Kevin Henkes and Kathi Appelt among others. They make picture book writing seem easy and effortless while it truly is one of the most difficult things to do. I equate writing picture books to writing poetry.
Having said that, it's one thing to express yourself, it's something else entirely to be understood.
Once my wife told the woman that we would paying with two 50 soles notes, all was well. The food arrived earlier than expected, the chicken skin was crispy y muy rico, the French fries came with aji sauce, and the salad even had aguacate palta on it.
I could list several other phrases that make my point, but I think by now you get it. And those were all from one sermon. But it’s not just this single sermon.
3. Drain pasta mixture; return to pan. Stir in chicken mixture and 1/2 cup mozzarella. Spoon into 8-inch square baking dish.
Now, after the 2011 season, I’m pretty sure I got items 2 and 4 to add to item 1. But it seems that I may have misplaced item 3. So, this Christmas, that’s what I’m hoping for. Another item 3.
Chloe is crazy. (no offense Jen) If Chloe were a human, she would be a nail-biting, bathrobe wearing, chain-smoking lunatic. Chloe is nervous, and her nervousness results in a abhorrence of men, busses, and things that make noises… You get the picture. After a few lunge/bites at male friends, Chloe and I have a private relationship– just Chloe and me. Avoiding people, places and things. We have a great time.
A young goalkeeper as well is in our sights apparently with former Stokie Ben Foster now at Man Utd, on a season long loan one name. The other is Coventry City’s Westwood.
“Come in, quickly, children! James, how pleasant to see you! Where are your parents? Is Bethany with you? William, please push us off from the dock? Thank you.”
1 cup small-diced walnuts
It is definitely time for a cup of tea (or coffee)... I'm posting late this week, because our town had flash flood rains on Sunday.... we had the rain filling our kitchen! Thankfully we had only a clean up job, with no real damage...
One fortuitous difference between this trip and the last one was that Kelly, Mike, Liam and Thea just happened to be in Philly at the same time we were! I had caught a tweet of Kelly's the afternoon that we were headed there; they had gone to New Jersey on a day trip, but decided to take a spur-of-the-moment side trip and had no idea we would be there too. How often does that sort of coincidence happen?
Here, in case you want to hear it, is "A ciegas," sung by the cantaor (flamenco singer) Miguel Poveda. Just click: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=E3CJiJX-qLE
The Easter special was a bit unusual. They baked an actual Easter egg into a loaf of bread shaped like a basket. The bread is slightly sweet like the challah and glazed with spinkles. Catnip for a food blogger. Maybe an exotic treat for a kid who likes bread and eggs? They were $3.75 Saturday. I don't know if they were a lark or something that Bon Fresco is trying out for the season.
“You shouldn’t have bought it in the first place if you didn’t feel comfortable in it.”
As for taste, the ice cream has a fresh, clear flavor. The corn syrup and cream cheese keep it from being thin or icy, in fact the texture is actually a bit fluffy. It's quite different from the muddled, rich, taste of a custard-based vanilla ice cream. My vanilla-ice-cream-loving husband really enjoyed the ice cream, which is a good thing, seeing as we have 2 quarts of it!
And here is what the lucky winner will receive.
We had some potlights installed to highlight the shadows and texture of the wall. Other sources of light include the fab Pottery Barn sconces and my vintage chandelier. At night, the chandelier is like a glowing moon. Chloe loves to look up at it.
At least there's the Flyers.
I would just once like to see the fire and determination that the likes of Jordan, Zek, Bird and more showed for entire careers. That type of passion and intensity coupled with the most talented and gifted player in the Association one of the best of all time.
I have heard of many people getting seriously injured when using a chain saw. This is most unfortunate. However, it is also easily avoided in most cases.
+ DONNIE GOINES – 20X
Duet: After performing solo, Rihanna took to the stage to sing alongside Coldplay’s Chris Martin
However, personally, my favorite game is Mille Bornes, the card game from France where you battle your opponent to see who can make it 700 miles first while avoiding running out of gas, flat tires, and accidents.
Total running time 1 hour 30 mins 12 secs
The Republicans are already making plans to have ANOTHER budget battle over the deficit. This will be in September.
The plotting scene is one of silent cinema’s most famous. In one tremendous tracking shot, Murnau’s camera captures, then pulls ahead of the skulking Man, winding its way past the trees of a swamp and we know—instinctively, I think—that the Man is following us. That the camera never stops, or even shudders, along its path is important. It makes the journey from A to B inexorable. We reach the waiting Woman before the Man does, and when he does show up, seconds later, we feel he was bound to do so.
Sleep will disperse into its associated threads. But don’t wake up just yet.
I reached the hotel, checked in and made it to my room. I consumed my delicious McDonald's dinner while flipping channels on the TV and trying to get connected to their wi-fi. It was about 8:30 now, and it was still coming down outside.
Fought on July 27, 1864, the Battle of Kennesaw Mountain was one of the few direct Union assaults of Gen. William Tecumseh Sherman's campaign to take Atlanta. The Federal troops tried to storm heavily fortified position along the slopes of the mountain but were hurled back with severe losses. More than 4,000 men were reported killed, wounded or missing in just a few short hours.
Silver HM. Listeriosis during pregnancy. Obstet Gynecol Surv 1998; 53: 737-740.
The EvilGrade supports various famous software like Notepad, iTunes, Java plug-in, WinZip, Winamp, DAP, OpenOffices, LinkedIn, Speedbit, etc.
I still had to mow the lawn and do the gardening when I got home.
The firefighters quickly broke into my vehicle without breaking any windows, and set Lucy free. They actually timed themselves, trying to beat one of their previous break-in records. They managed to get Lucy out in about two and a half minutes. She had a smile ear to ear.
We decided to make it in pink only and not with black lining showing through.
Older people who have been there say that it’s a place of expectations.
The TLC challenge is Stamping Nostalgia. Holly challenged us to make a card without using the newfangled stamping stuff like die cuts and embossing folders. Eek! This looks naked without an embossed background. But then, I'll probably use this for Jack's birthday and he wouldn't appreciate embossing anyway.
When we go out of doors while harboring a communicable infection, or send our children to school as such, we assume that even if we do make someone else sick, “Well, it’s ONLY a cold.” This is ignorant and self-serving. That common cold might kill someone who waited years for a lifesaving organ transplant. Or, in my case, render me useless and in agony for upwards of an entire week – on top of suffering a cold. This week in particular, my family and I are in the process of relocating halfway across the province to Edmonton for the sole purpose of finding a better doctor for me, for my Interstitial Cystitis. Now the bulk of the responsibility falls to my husband, who has Parkinson’s disease, my 15 year old daughter, and my brother in-law who is literally the only person we have to help us move.
Another strand of coconut is banned from the sight of Master Reese.
"And?"
So we determined that at daybreak, we would go out to investigate yet again. This time as we approached the farmhouse--not having mentioned our concerns to her grandparents for fear of causing probable undue worry--I was armed with a short-handled shovel I'd found lying on the grass and Jane, not entirely convinced the sounds had come from any earthly emanations, with a long-handled flashlight and the mini-cassette recorder she rarely left home without.
MY PICK: MAY THE BEST MAN WIN.
As we come into this vibration here, I, Albion, come so that we might share some thoughts with yourselves concerning the Moon and its energy. We wish to speak about lunar ceremonies, the energies generated by such ceremonies and how that energy might be utilized for various purposes, and the importance of such ceremonies. First, however, we want to reiterate what we feel is very important at this particular time in human evolution, this being the necessity for making ceremony a part of one’s daily life. Oftentimes, people think that ceremony is only done on special occasions such as a rite of passage or religious ceremonies of some sort, but this is not the case. You will remember that we have made it clear that there is a difference between ritual and ceremony. Ritual is tradition…a religious or cultural tradition…for example, when we say cultural tradition, a wedding is a cultural tradition, as is a funeral ceremony and a rite of passage ceremony. When one is performing a ritual, it is written out or provided for you, and has, more often than not, been practiced the same way for generations. A tradition should not be changed. It should not be added to or taken away from. A ceremony, on the other hand, is far more spontaneous. You can feel free to choreograph and to write the words of any litany you so choose. In fact, ceremony comes more from the heart. Ceremony should be timed as rituals are timed. A winter solstice ritual, for example, must be done on the day of the winter solstice, and not at some other time of the year. Ceremony needs to be timed according to the phases of the Moon. In fact, let’s say this: solar-based ceremonies are masculine in their nature. Most of the time a solar rite is a ritual. On the other hand, ceremony is more feminine in its nature. It is more spontaneous and free, and in ceremony one is given more leverage. The timing of ceremony and ritual should never be overlooked. It should never be reduced in terms of its value and importance, for if the timing is not done appropriately, then the effectiveness of a ceremony or ritual is simply going to be less than what it would have been had it been timed correctly.
Hope you had a merriest of Christmas...wish I did! But as the old philospher said, despite all the amputations there were a number of great moments to be had this past December 25th, including the receiving of a number of hotcha gifts that really helped to sate the soul so t' speak. These gifts include a collection of DENNIS THE MENACE DVDs replicating that series' second season courtesy of Mr. Lou Rone, the entire run of the legendary JOHNNY STACCATO private dick thriller featuring John Cassavetes thanks to Brad Kohler, and none other than volume one of the daily BLONDIE comic strip (featuring the very first right up until the wedding of Blondie and Dagwood) via the graciousness of one Bill Shute, a name that better do a few ringy-dings in your mind after all these years! All of these items are whatcha'd call necessary to retain the proper BLOG TO COMM frame o' mind, but for now they'll have to wait their turn w/regards to their time in the blog spotlight because frankly, I'm gonna hafta eat 'n digest everything about these items before I can give 'em a fair shake! For now, I'd like to talk at'cha 'bout a tried and true book that's graced my library in one form since at least 1970, and if it coulda survived all those years w/o being tossed into a wastebasket or sold at a garage sale (which come to think of it is what happened to my first copy!) then it coulda survived in yours as well!
Brief plot overview: 16-year-old Hazel has terminal (what started as thyroid) cancer that is currently under control due to an experimental (and entirely fictional) drug, Phalanxifor. Much to her annoyance, she is made to attend Cancer Support Group, where people sit around and say inspirational things about their battle. Then Augustus Waters comes along, a 17-year-old amputee (thanks to osteosarcoma), and everything changes. I won’t say more as I really want you to go and read it.
Do not keep the alabaster boxes of your love and tenderness sealed up until your friends are dead. Fill their lives with sweetness. Speak approving, cheering words while their ears can hear them and while their hearts can be thrilled by them.
Other visions came and went; I drifted in and out of them for some time. I could not recall them very well and I sensed that the “real” visions were somewhere just beyond a veil, some threshold I had yet to cross. The other participants seemed to be fully into that space now. Everyone was sighing or gently laughing throughout the night – everyone except me. My experience overall was pleasant and relaxing, and the energy was much better, but to be honest, nothing much happened. I enjoyed the icaros and drifted in and out some more, and then about an hour in, something did happen. I suddenly purged.
The Trolley takes us to South Slope, as it's beginning to be called.
Edith Piaf's personal life was nothing short of tragic. Her only child, a daughter born of an early liaison, died of meningitis at the age of two. The love of her life was killed in an airplane accident. She married twice, divorced once and became addicted to alcohol and painkillers. The intense, haunting gaze of her portraits is that of a caged bird, not perhaps a sparrow, but a hawk who wishes to soar and finds its leg tethered to a post. For even though this tiny (she stood 4' 8") woman with the huge voice found the notes to make her songs legendary in her own time, only she knew their true cost. Only she understood what lay behind them. Perhaps, in the end, that is the secret of her success: in her, people recognized their own longing and despair. In her, the "little sparrow" was a nightingale.
We don't want to keep you in suspense any longer, so here are the Special Top 6:
I can honestly say I have been dreading this birthday for at least a year or 2. I am no longer going to be in my 20's now it's my 30's! How did that happen? I swear just yesterday I was dying to graduate high school & now 30! My hubby is a few years older than me so when he turned 30 & HATED it, I teased him relentlessly. Now my day has come, but I will continue to remind him he will always be older than me! :)
First of all, Do not be yoked together with unbelievers. For what do righteousness and wickedness have in common? Or what fellowship can light have with darkness? 2 Corinthian 6:14 (NIV) If there are unsaved “friends” who are close to you, who you aren’t ministering to, then they very well may need to change categories. Dear sisters, we must be mindful about who our friends are. Having someone in your life, just because the two of you go way back, is not a good reason to allow them to stay in your inner circle. While as difficult as it may be if you want to grow, and experience the ever-increasing faith that an intimate relationship with the Lord brings, you must consider who your closest friends are. Think carefully about the relationship, especially if they have grown comfortable with being around you and not being saved.
It's also a very deep black I like very much.
In the 1993 Draft, the choice was between Drew Bledsoe from Washington State, and Rick Mirer from Notre Dame. It was a dead heat between the two, but Mirer had the edge in popularity among the press and fans, probably due to Notre Dame being nationally televised almost every week, and comparisons to another Notre Dame quarterback who made an offseason splash (becoming a Kansas City Chief after fourteen years in San Francisco), Joe Montana. I was eleven years old at the time, and living in South Bend, Indiana. Mirer was a local hero, not only for being Notre Dame’s favorite son, but also because he played his high school ball at Goshen High School, about twenty miles away. What I look back at, and find to be interesting is that the comparisons to Joe Montana were based more on Mirer’s deficiencies than his assets. The major comparisons were Mirer’s small and slender build, Mirer not possessing the strongest arm ever found on a quarterback, and not playing in a pass-first offense. The great ones are great because of their assets, not their liabilities.
+MK
“Kenya has regrettably followed the example of Chad, which violated its obligations under international law by providing safe haven to President Bashir during his visit to the country last month,” said Michelle Kagari, Deputy Director in Amnesty’s Africa programme.
This is therefore only a beginning contract, if you will. It’s what you select to arrive. You selected your parents, your race, your country, and even your biological attributes and predispositions. Your past karma is all part if it, and what you call your “past life experience” is also there. It’s complex, but you often feel it at the cellular level. It’s what makes Humans drive toward a passion to be artists, musicians, mothers and fathers, or even criminals. It’s a powerful force.
I first met Edwin (not his real name) one Saturday in September 2011. He was around 5 feet 4 inches tall but was all skin and bones that his slight mother could actually carry him with very little effort in her arms. Bedridden, unable to talk, and with a nasogastric tube stuck into his nose, he did not present a very comfortable sight. Edwin has SSPE, or subacute sclerosing pancephalitis, actually been living with it for the past two years. He was then only 11 years old. SSPE usually occurs at around the age of 9-11 in children who have had measles before the age of 2 or before they had been vaccinated against the disease. It is a rare sequelae of untreated measles but it happened to Edwin. His family lives in a single-room house in one of the most impoverished and least sanitary areas in urban Metro Manila – Payatas.
In seed time learn, in harvest teach, in winter enjoy.
Add a ¼ cup of vinegar and a ¼ cup of sugar to the bottle.
It will take a revolution to change but it will be a quite revolution that will start in people homes and gardens as they learn to leave behind the shackles of the so called “free market” and learn to provided for themselves and show generosity and hospitality to others.
A hug can break a language barrier, and make your travel so much merrier.
If only they discussed these issues over numberless dinner parties and after consuming a few Guardian articles. That is: why isn’t the EDL like us? We care, ever so deeply. We love the Brown Exotic – and the Browner the deeper and the more exotica. Browns can do no bad.
It has been almost a year...and I sure have missed all of you :o)
Do you admit to not knowing everything? Everyday. It is an opportunity to show kids the fun of learning. It also offers a bonding experience as well as letting our boys know it is okay to admit that you do not know everything.
Tonight Tacoma plays at Reno, and first pitch is set for 6:35 pm (pre-game show at 6:20). The broadcast is on South Sound Sports 850 AM and streaming online right here. Tacoma starts RHP Forrest Snow (0-3, 7.30) against Reno LHP Zach Kroenke (2-1, 4.50).
Bob’s challenge was met and tripled. I explicitly said that those three were “off the top of my head” and that “I’m sure more could be added”. And what does he do? First, he ignores the fact that his challenge was met and even bested—he asked for one institution and he got three. Worse, he blatantly distorted what I did say:
“It is scary knowing that everyone will be watching,” Kaila said.
Therefore, since we have been made right in God’s sight by faith, we have peace with God because of what Jesus Christ our Lord has done for us.” Romans 5:1
has lived and worked in Brooklyn, NY since 1998 and her beloved hometown is St. Paul/Minneapolis, MN. She received her Masters of Fine Arts at the School of Visual Arts in 2006. Currently, she is exploring a new body of work relating to cultural exchange opportunities, from Alaska video artist-in-residence focusing on climate change to a 5-week international fellowship in exchange with the traditional craftspeople of Orissa, India to volunteer work in Dharamsala with Lha Charitable Trust. Utilizing film and video as a tool to investigate the past, present and future through a poetic and complex interplay between images, to offer an opportunity for reflection and meditation. Shannon captures vignettes from mundane to beautiful and editing in a collage-like style, she explores the nature of fragmented memory, triggered by temporality and impermanence.
I chaperoned a middle school dance not too long ago and found myself watching two brothers interact in the goofy, inside jokey way that only brothers can. And I smiled because my boys have each other.
On the days I have French class, I have about a 40 minute underground commute on Line 3 and Line 12. The first métro station on Line 12 after crossing the Seine from Rive Droit to Rive Gauche is Assemblée Nationale.
Still to come tonight, we will have our first Gut Check on TV, someone has an opportunity to win a contract, and we’ll also have a Tag Team Title match. Who is facing Joe and Magnus? Motor City Machineguns? ERic Young and ODB? Jeff Hardy and Mr. Anderson? Kazarian and Christopher Daniels?
Ice covering the volcano could melt and flood farms with a torrent of water as wide as the Amazon river.
- Carey Mulligan is thought to be tying the knot in a low-key ceremony this weekend. Her relationship to musician Marcus Mumford (of the band Mumford and Sons) has been quite a speedy one- they got engaged in August 2011 after dating just five months.
i chose today to start the week off with some refreshing images ..
I asked her what her definition of being serious with a guy was. She said that she feels like going on a date with a guy is being serious. Perhaps my views on this topic are skewed because I go on so many dates. I see a date as a way of testing the waters to see if I want to see someone again. I don’t think a date makes me owe a guy something.
This week, the kiddos are learning all about the circle shape! Shapes are such a fun thing to teach because there’s just so many things we can do! Though, we do have to restrict ourselves from doing too much cause we might ran out of activities for future lessons. (hehe)
As a guitarist, I’ve definitely been sucked into buying the new and best pedals that are hot off the press, but I have found that this leaves you broke and unsatisfied. In this post, I’ll talk about deciding on the overdrive that’s right for you. There are a lot of different questions that you need to ask yourself before you make a purchase.
1-1/2 teaspoons black pepper
“Such imagination.”
P.S. I personally love spinach, but to those who are wary of the green color: you can't even taste the spinach. All you taste is healthy deliciousness wrapped in rainbows & unicorns. Promise. (I've never tasted unicorn, just saying.)
Anyway, I was getting increasingly forgetful, much to the chagrin of my bread adoring youngest, to whom breakfast, if bacon is not on the table, should be slice of bread, kaya, slice of bread. Option three should be slice of bread, Nutella, another slice of bread (I know, shocking isn't it?) But, never, never scones. He's the anomaly in our scone loving family.
“Why’s that?” asked the barman.
I know that this coming year will be full of fun now that we have the "baby" phase behind us as a family but I am so grateful for this past year. Matteo showed me that maybe I am a baby person - I almost didn't mind those midnight feedings, all snuggled up with him watching him drift back into his warm milk drunkenness. He has brought out the sweet side of his brother and sister (usually) who try to take care of him and cheer him up when he's sad and play with him when he's happy.
Tomorrow I will be like a zombi, walking sleeping...
Dave Stevens of Harrisonburg will earn a bachelor’s degree in integrated science and technology with a concentration in energy. After earning his associates degree at a community college, Dave enrolled at JMU — and soared. During his time at JMU, he’s worked very hard, learning everything he could in his courses and “taking ownership of his capstone project” as his major professor told me. Dave traveled twice to Costa Rica for his ISAT capstone project, an energy assessment at Punta Leona resort. He’s also volunteered with Harrisonburg’s Big Brothers/Big Sisters, mentoring a young friend.
The role of American press and the way they reported the Afghan resistance is important. A radical transformation of fanatic thoughts during the ‘Afghan Jihad’ against Soviet Union was overlooked with the indiscriminate and unaccountable assistance of the US to the radical Islamist Mujahideen factions. It was those last years of the anti-Soviet resistance that Osama Bin Ladin and influx of angry Arab fighters penetrated and radicalized some Mujahideen. And later it was them who used Afghanistan as training ground for Arab Jihadis to spread terror across the globe. How could the US remain unaware of all this radicalization happening? And what responsibility comes to the questionable role of American press in that era?
Which would be cool, but I'm already anxious and stressing out at the task before me...
Ollie.
I feel so blessed to have the life I have. I have had a couple of those "pause and reflect" moments today where I have realized how lucky I am to be married to Ammon and to be the mother of these amazing kids. I love being able to just stop and play with them or sit down and snuggle them. That is my most important role right now and I want to enjoy every minute of it.
However, thanks to the Ease into 5K app, and my iPhone, I am starting to “get” running. The program has pre-set workouts and the voice in my head tells me when to run and when to walk and I don’t have the opportunity over think things and I actually get a decent amount of exercise without having to engage my brain (which sometimes has plans of its own, that involve not running).
I believe that all my own best writing has happened under pressure, and very fast. I also believe that I need to say it, shout it and move it before I give it to actors. I am very excited to lead a two day workshop for playwrights in which I will guide you through fast, immediate, uncensored writing, which will culminate in a performance of the most powerful theatrical words written in the workshop. We can do this, and it will be breath-taking.
it wants to come back, to roam.
And here it is in its new home...
So, send in all your vegetarian only recipes – Fried Rice , Hakka Noodles, Glass Noodles, Stir fries – anything Chinese – to this event !
We played "Find the Sorcerer's Stone," where they found garden rocks I'd hidden in the living room. (Lee opined that, if we get any poorer, that's what we'll have to do for Easter. "Go on, kids, find all the rocks!") And, we played violent, monstrously competitive games of Twister that went on and ON and ON. Children are very bendy creatures, as it turns out.
lets face it
BUZZCOCKS – Time’s Up (1977)
Only the laughing crows and battle cries of raptors could be heard in the forest. Songbirds fled to sing their cheerful melodies in less mournful places. My tears became the creek that flowed from the great mountains into the Tuckaseegee. Beyond an eternity of hope, shards of my crystalline heart can still be found.
17And from the tribe of Benjamin they gave Gibeon and Geba with their grass-lands;
Bonus: Each row of molding/shoes only takes up about 12" so depending on your wall space you have room for lots and lots of heels (read: some shoe shopping might be in order. I know...it's terrible.)
It’s the name that first attracts Alice:
I had a whole other title planned for this post, but, well, it wasn't quite appropriate. Moving on.
Goodness: Songs about love or in major keys can convey goodness. An honestly portrayed figure or a portrait that you just can’t take your eyes off, a story about right triumphing over wrong or a web application that does something useful and valuable for free are all ways in which a creative artefact can convey a sense of goodness.
One of our fav designers paid us a visit this past weekend. Julie deLeon and Bill worked together for years and they still collaborate on many projects. She is also a dear friend. Julie is portrayed in the recent edition of Chicago Home and Garden. Her new design firm Groundwork is up and running. She even mentioned Grow Modular as one of her fav's in the article.
The former BJP president has decided to challenge his conviction before the Delhi High Court, with his counsel alleging the case against him was “framed”.
I'm tired of hearing wealthy athletes, entertainers and politicians of all parties talking about innocent mistakes, stupid mistakes or youthful mistakes, when we all know they think their only mistake was getting caught. I'm tired of people with a sense of entitlement, rich or poor.
Goal: Restrict oil companies from writing off oil spill cleanup costs.
If you live in the Los Angeles area I would love to know if you have tried Brunch Butler. For those of us that live outside of their delivery area, we can dream about what we would order. What would you choose? Please leave a comment below.
Watching Jaya aunty board the aircraft to Bombay I got reminded of an article by a celebrated journalist more than half a decade back in one of the national dailies in which he (a hint!) lamented the species called “admirers” – a “fan” in popular parlance – and labeling them to be “Goodwill Hunters”! Well, he must have had his own reasons (very flimsy from his account in the piece though) but it hurt me immensely. Because I am also a fan of a very few but have never indulged into “goodwill hunting” – so far!
-can pander to the religious right without being beholden to them,
Then……today we had to complete our plan of service at CMH (community mental health) with DH, myself and DD. This was with DD’s counselor. We talked about the general crap and how things are improving at home but how all hell had broken loose at school. DD was put on daily behavior reports at school and they were also using some cool techniques with her—I don’t think I blogged about any of this stuff yet. But the best yet…..was……—for ONCE they got to see the true DD. She had a breakdown and although it breaks my heart to watch my daughter lose control…….I was quite happy that the counselor could see what I deal with every single day. DD argued everything cuz she was pissed. Even things that I KNOW she loves…..for example…..the counselor suggested the horse therapy again in the spring and DD LOVED that. But cuz DD was pissed already—hell no she didn’t want to go (even though I know she does) and she didn’t give a damn what we said cuz no one was going to make her do anything—-LOL—that is basically what she was telling us in a nutshell. I just used the techniques of NOT engaging her and if she got too out of control I would start to count down from 3 and she knows when I get to 1 that she loses a privilege. But it was VERY lovely watching the counselor get a tiny slice of pie I’m served with everyday. LOVED every minute of it. And the best was……when we were sitting there and I told the counselor that thing were going to change again cuz I got approved for a home chore worker. DH looked at me and I said……ya, I haven’t had a chance to tell u cuz she just left and I came straight here.
in Chapter 5...
Why? Why are you sitting at your desk, a little tipsy and a lot drowsy, writing when you’d rather go to sleep?
Here is my card for this week
This reminded me of something I saw a while ago – octopuses using coconut shells as shelter, in a rare demonstration of tool use by an invertebrate. The researchers observed the octopuses carrying around coconut shell halves in a rather ungainly fashion, and used them to hide under, or in some cases, carried two and ended up being sheltered inside the reassembled coconut. Cool. This research was published by some staff at the Museum of Victoria (in Current Biology), and they also uploaded some videos of the octopuses, as seen below. I love the way the octopus saunters past the camera at the start; and the excellent demo of how tube-feet work at the end.
4) 12 Texas A&M Aggies (29-12/9-6 BigXII) @ 24 Texa$ Longhorns (24-14/11-4)
I continued the first section of the novel, June. This is the first chapter that is set completely in the past. It’s about Veronica’s memories of her daughter.
View from the southwest.
“Robert?” said he, interrogatively.
There are too many beautiful boys and girls, men and women, in this city to count.
Sometimes you cannot express some ideas and opinions as well as you could in your native language. But describing life in New York has proven to be difficult in German because my life style has become so more American than European. Therefore, it just had to be two different views!
I have never been tagged before, so can I just break a rule and not tag anyone? Rule breakers don't ask!
According to CNN Money, the American workforce is at its smallest size since the 1980s. Although there has been some significant job growth, many have just stopped “engaging” with the job market—aka “job market dropouts.” It appears some adults have temporarily conceded to unemployment and returned to the drawing board for community college classes and technical skills, like manufacturing plant training. Job skills depreciate the longer someone is out of work and vocational education seems to be the only option left.
(iii) The final judgment of the District Court against Hilton International does not really preclude Hilton from continuing to use its brand in India. I think and I’m not sure about this: The Plaintiff company, Hilltone filed only a suit for groundless threats and in such a scenario the Court can only injunct Hilton from continuing with its threats. The Court cannot restrain Hilton from using its own registered trademarks and in fact the final order did not have anything to this effect. Hilton can continue using its trademarks until such time that they are revoked by the IPAB or the Registrar of the trademarks.
I still feel tired from yesterday - must be getting old! And I've managed to end up sunburnt, even though it didn't seem all that hot. I had a halter neck top on so I've got strap marks around my neck - very attractive I'm sure!
Running water is equal value to gold.
There is more! Trinity is going to give one lucky commenter an advance readers copy of The Mephisto Kiss and it's open international!
From the very first paragraph, McEntire's gorgeous writing style completely captivated me. Seriously, if you have Hourglass in your possession, pick it up and read the first paragraph. McEntire's descriptions are beautiful, poetic even, and her dialogue is impeccably witty and well crafted. The story flows smoothly at the perfect pace and the short chapters had me going, "Just one more chapter." time and time again.
Berry: “SILLY! Yes you can.”
Sr. Garcia-Margallo said his government would “have nothing to say” on the matter of Scotlands independence adding that the constitutional arrangements of the UK nations “is their own business”.
St. Timothy”s Episcopal Church
Tights:: nooot sure. probably from Marshall's or something.
Psychomania is one of those movies that I first saw long, long ago in childhood and never forgot. It clung to the recesses of my mind like an odd, deranged dream, a better calibre dream, but an odd and deranged one nonetheless and I always remembered it. A lot later I met my husband and, disturbingly frequently, I would mention Psychomania in conversation and recall all its little oddities to him; zombie bikers, Beryl Reid, frogs and incongruous folk singing, and he quite honestly thought I’d made it up. He genuinely believed I was the flavour of crazy that invents bizarre, low budget British B-Movies and is so utterly convinced by the delusion that I try force other people of their existence too. He married me anyway, and finally after all these years I got to sit him down and make him watch it, so I got the last laugh. Who’s crazy now, husband? Hmmm?!
Many people will admit to a bit of sentimentality when it comes to catching up with friends on Facebook, I have to confess that it’s been stirring up a very specific piece of nostalgia for me (Cue the time-travel music and wavy-screen effect).
* Only 1 envelope can be redeemed per person during the redemption days.
I woke up thinking about Nathan and Siberia and Sidney Reilly, the world's first modern spy and possible model for the James Bond character many years later (because even in sleep, my mind is obviously making strange connections). Reilly was about 11 years older than Nathan, but they were both sent to Siberia at the same time. What if they had known each other or their paths had crossed in a Siberian labor camp? But if not, they met the same fate. At least Nathan was returned home to die, whereas the final resting place of Reilly's remains is still disputed.
I did manage to roll out of bed at 5.00am and scout around for a location for an upcoming location shoot.
We finally got into our room and ready for bed around midnight on Wednesday. Although sleeping arrangements were less than ideal for any of us - Cooper had a hard time falling to sleep with us in the room, more on that later. We eventually all fell asleep, ready for the day ahead.
11.Red City Radio-They Don't Make Gravel Roads Like They Used To
Several years ago, while attempting to leave the established parade route during a City-approved rally several years ago, I was physically restrained by an Auxiliary officer who demanded I throw away my foam board poster (which read "Justice Not Violence") before cutting through the police barricades. She said I might use the poster as a weapon, prompting me to wonder if she could read.
Councilmember Andrews — the leading Council opponent of the youth curfew proposal and the leading proponent of the loitering/prowling one — spent more of his time discussing the weaknesses of the curfew bill.
Anyways , here goes with ten facts about myself....
Even though using artificial heart and left ventricular assist devices is less efficient and safe, we might as well use them, simply because we have a severe lack of donor organs.
So, as with previous instances in which the United States government became involved in the cases of high-profile Chinese dissidents (such as Wei Jingsheng and Fang Lizhi), I think that if Chen Guangcheng has taken refuge in the American embassy, it will cause severe short-term stress in the U.S.-China relationship, and that this stress may be amplified by the dynamics of American election-year politics.
My heart was an oasis of life and she was the center of it, the grass was green, flowers were blooming around her, water was sparkling into the sunshine and when I was sleeping her embrace was caressing my soul with her angelic presence.
In this edition of the talk show you can hear my first foray into news broadcasting as well as the usual fun & banter with Mat Fraser & Liz Carr. Or as Damon Rose from Ouch! so eloquently puts it:
When I was 7 years old, my dad took our family on a big camping trip. When we arrived, I helped my Dad pick the perfect place for our campsite. We put up our family tent, built our fire pit, and started to cook dinner. Darkness came fast and we bedded down for the night. Everything seemed to be going great, until around 2 a.m. when a Texas-size rainstorm moved in and it started to pour. Before very long, we soon realized that our perfect campsite was positioned on a slope; and, all of the rainwater was flooding into our tent. We were drenched! Everything we owned was soaked, sleeping bags and all. Unfortunately, our trip was ruined, so we packed up and drove home in the middle of the night. I was so disappointed, and all I wanted to know was…why didn’t someone post a “No Camping” sign at this campsite? It would have totally changed the outcome of our trip!
The raw edges showed, as is typical with Bruce Nauman. It is a well thought-out aesthetic which is absent from the drawings. With the sculptures the look was at once refined and crude. The pumps showed, the wires were hastily twisted; the black rubber lining the pools flopped about the floor, all of which are more about utilitarianism than about looking good. And this made it look good. These things all ended up being carefully postured elements of the composition.
CR: I would love to continue playing all the Mozart roles I have interpreted up to know.
Can you see my twine?
Note 1: My comments on each chapter are indented and in bold text. Plain font is for summary.
Admittedly, casual sex isn’t for everyone. In the case of women, most of us were raised from a very young age that sex was something that came after love and that commitment we made with our bodies was some sort of lifetime connection we made with our partner. As women we learn, with some disappointment, this is not always the case. In fact it may never be the case.
But I was panicked to my core, I didn’t care about our cause, I wanted only to stay alive, to find a place to hide, to escape.
There are times when I might actually be interested in what is said. I try to cut to the chase by asking, “What’s this going to cost me?” but it’s like trying to stop a stampede. They just keep rolling on. Or, they’ll respond, “We’ll get to that later.” This is when my radar kicks in. “I’d like to get to it now because if I can’t afford it, we’re wasting both your time and mine.” If the party continues, my “I’m not interested” mode comes into play and I hang up. I’ve had a few callers call back immediately and try to continue the convertsation, but I hang up on them a second time.
The one whose purpose is Moksha, must worship Is’vara, after knowing my pravRtti (tendency to manifest), work, cause, and glory, after understanding what the essence of that (tattva) which is ultimate (tatpara – beyond that).
2 tablespoons canola or vegetable oil
Here's the thing: I don't want to be in college. I want to write.
To me it seems as if we narrow the wide gospel of Jesus into a very thin wedge. As I look around I see people who feel trapped, by the credit crunch, by their houses, by they jobs – to them I would share freedom. I see those who are lonely, downtrodden, who have failed to live up to the image the world has demanded they recreate themselves in – to them I would share love and acceptance. I see the breakdown of community and family, broken homes, broken lives, scared and scarred children – to them I would take the true Father. I see those who feel crippled by the local authorities, powerless to bring change – to them I would take the Spirit.
"If we are to achieve our dream, the time to act is now, given the inertia in the socio-economic system, and that the adverse effects of climate change and loss of biodiversity cannot be reversed for centuries or are irreversible," the authors write.
The latest details to emerge include Guy Pearce (recently seen as Peter Weyland in the virus trailer for Prometheus) in talks to play geneticist Aldrich Killian. Previous casting details have included Ben Kingsley being talks to play the main villain, and of course the return of Scarlet Johansson, Gwyneth Paltrow and Don Cheadle.
Nugent was slated to serve as the headliner of a Fort Knox concert on June 23, but the organizers of the event have decided against the Motor City Madman appearing at the show.
Compression stockings rock.. NO swelling!
returning on the day you left. Once mature,
Planning an avalanche of posts, so this post is more like a warning prior to the avalanche.
32. Nails and hair do not continue to grow after we die. They do appear longer when we die, however, as the skin dehydrates and pulls back from the nail beds and scalp.
Why? Because using our eyes is essential to interacting with the society around us. If we don’t stare, communication is impossible. By now, you probably realize that I’m referring to hard of hearing people who read lips.
-Categorize your medicine into sub-categories:
Also inspired by my breakfasts these morns ... anything buttery right from cookies or scones or toast spread with layers of cream cheese ,butter and my chunky strawberry preserve which am so oooo in love with .........
Vamps aside, the costumes at Blood on the Beach were great! There were zombies everywhere!
So here's what I'm wearing today, Monday 17th October
-$5000
Terror in America (19): Saudi, Syrian, and Palestinian Authority Press Attack Giuliani and U.S.
They concluded, even though the results were positive, that more studies are needed in order to discover the exact mechanism in which omega-3 fatty acids reduce prostate cancer cells.
Remove from the oven and let them cool for 5 minutes. Unmold the tartlet by putting a plate on top and quickly flip it over. Carefully remove the mold. The tartlet is now open-faced, beautiful and ready to be enjoyed.
As for walking up the aisle after the ceremony I would do it and not slink out the side door. Your guests want to celebrate this wonderful moment with you so take your time making your way up the aisle and acknowledge their cheers and best wishes.
But many fans of dead artists also were not alive when Jimi Hendrix performed in the late 1960s, or were too young to appreciate Queen roaring through Montreal in 1985, their Live Aid year. If the technology has gotten this advanced, why not want to witness a spot-on revival of a lost performer’s presence?
Windsurfing
Arrange the avocado slices on plates, then toss the lettuce with about half the dressing (or more as necessary) and plate on top of the avocados. Nestle the grapefruit segments in the salad, and top with the shrimp. Drizzle the remaining dressing on the shrimp and serve
I'd like to say that I'm wrong in my outlook, but I don't think I am. I am willing to stand corrected, but the WotC Creative Team will literally have to pull a white rabbit out of Pinto's Conical Cap - and I just don't see it happening.
As always, I have no idea who the first act is, as they and I haven't been formally introduced. By the looks of things, they come with no shortage of frills but will they be equally well-stocked with thrills?
It is also important to use good strong flour. Buy 00 flour. It is now easy to get hold of- even some supermarkets carry it.
What does this mythical parking app do you ask?
from the hat but
Paper: AC card stock / Robins Nest
I admit, varying words is not easy. But honestly, does your reader really notice if you've used the word cacophany twice in one book? Umm, yes! At least I do.
"I am sort of freaked out about my name/image being all over the place," her e-mail reads.
Now I am not touching the scheduling of games or where they need to be. I mean, the fact is we can shave the games off the schedule and generate 3 weeks of playoffs. What’s even better is other bowls can bond together and form other tournaments that would be big for making statements for the next year.
Andries heard his wife's calls for help and set upon the attackers with an axe.
So apparently, someone is tweaking Wonder Woman's costume and origin.
Conculsion: My life a year ago was so much more exciting and fulfilling then it is at the moment. And while that is quite disappointing, I’m not that down about it because (1) coming home to Toronto and moving back in with my parents, I expected it and (2) I am making changes so that 5(!) months from now I will definitely be in another country. (Verdict is still out on whether I have been accepted into the Spanish program, but I have 2 back up plans!)
01. Intro (0:25)
shear near
On the PSC’s recommendation that a committee be set up to supervise and scrutinise the EC’s effort to clean up the electoral roll, he said, this was contrary to the EC’s position as an independent body as provided for under the Federal Constitution.
The Germany legend netted 67 times for Bayern Munich in the 1972-73 campaign, a feat that was not bettered until the Argentina international completed his treble in Catalunya on Wednesday.
who deserve to call themselves
It's Guerlain, okay?!
her gingerbread house.
Hier möche ich gerne teilnehmen:
don't go to school and I'm a SAHM so.... sigh.
We are to have the spring vacation all next week.
I’m having a quiet night tonight. I have to take some people to Cooktown at 05:30 and then do the school run back here at 08:00, then take some people to Cooktown for the hospital at 09:00, then bring them back after 12:00, then do the afternoon school run. It’s going to be a big day again.
I want to get started, how long have I got?
Next time the clipboard lady comes with lots of other people to take you away. Lots of big words you don't understand like 'aggressive' 'confrontational' and 'care order' float around the room and you can't see your pink balloons so scream and scream. Mummy and Daddy cry and tell you to be a good girl, that you'll love your new home, it'll be full of your favourite things to do, they'll come to see you soon.
So elections are indispensable and fundamental to representative parliamentary democracy.
"The situation is that we have an average of 55 murders a day.
The OAS is supposed to be a regional organization made up by the sovereign States of this hemisphere. Such an assertion, like many others which are made everyday, involves a great number of lies. The least we can do is to be aware of them, if we are to preserve the spirit of struggle and our confidence on a more decent world.
Drinkability: 5
Growing up, I wasn't a big fan of this day. I have three brothers, no sisters... so I was always the victim. I tried not to be gullible, but it didn't always work! I think the best prank happened when I was about 2, my brother Scott was 4, and another brother Larry was about 19. Larry was getting ready for work, and Scott came in from outside and told him that all four tires on his Jeep were FLAT!!! Larry, of course, was angry, and ran outside as fast as he could to see what would possibly cause all four tires to go flat. And he turned around, and there was Scott standing at the front door just CRACKING UP!! He got pranked by a FOUR YEAR OLD!!! :) Good times. My brother Scott has always been the biggest tease. He absolutely loves pulling pranks. I hated that growing up, but looking back it was pretty funny. Now he has an eleven year old son that is JUST like him. So he's getting a taste of his own medicine! haha.
A 1! Reroll? 1! The armor roll? double 1! Him rolling 1s against my armor is good for me, just funny with all these 1's shooting about.
The title of this post is a draft I’ve had saved for more than two years now. Two years, nine months and eleven days, actually. But I’ll get to that.
Thanks very much for your comments while I was away. I have read your suggestions carefully and I'll do my best to improve!
I read the word cornucopia in another blog yesterday and it reminded me of how much I loved that word when I was younger. It seemed like a really big word at the time. I was a kid then, so it was a really big word. I could read it, say it, spell it, and define it. I was hot stuff. I think it needs a comeback, the word cornucopia, and not just around Thanksgiving time. We also need to bring back milquetoast. It’s a hell of a word. But I digress……….
Here’s another question. Think of the low sounds of a cello or bassoon. Which colour group? 95% will say 3. Around 4% will say 2 and almost no one will say 1.
My last posting was May 2010. And I was promising to update more often. Yeah, well. :)
So lately I have been hanging out with my friends for a change and not being totally and completely secluded and to myself. I like it! I didn’t realize how much I have missed my friends and how much I have missed being apart of their lives. I feel like I have missed so much. I feel kind of guilty and a little selfish for it.
“How often do I have to tell you – you’re supposed to knock before coming in!”
Gear: Auto
Adapted from Cooks’ Illustrated
And it is a great day to be alive, I am so thankful I woke up this morning, if I hadn't you would not be having the pleasure of viewing my card and reading my post....
I'm Pleased that the Wood Grain
Not the most straightforward route on the fellracing calendar.
At SU, I will be majoring in Advertising at the S.I. Newhouse School of Public Communications. This is a combination of everything I am interested in: consumerism, creativity, critical thinking, and working with people. The great thing about SU is that their programs are accredited to meet the standards of top corporations seeking to employ students. I also met with the chair of the department of advertising, James Tsao, and he took me under his wing to plan out my classes for the fall. It was comforting to know that I could meet up with the SU staff so easily after e-mailing them a night before. Everyone who works at SU is incredibly friendly, helpful, and happy. I am excited to be in an environment that has an admirable focus on students.
My females have been shaking their hairy haunches to the music of Dolly Parton and I’m not ashamed to admit I joined them. The feisty diva’s latest CD is a must buy for anyone with an ear for cheerful ditties, sung in the chirpy-yet-defiant voice of a busty-yet-diminutive southern belle.
Journalists who bribe policemen are indicative of a flawed industry. Policemen who can be bribed are indicative of a flawed state.
funny story, though....
The plot concerns a father and son. Much of it is borrowed from Hamlet. An uncle murders a father and tricks the son into thinking he's responsible. The son flees into exile. The uncle takes the father's place on the throne as the new, demented king. While exiled, the son is visited by his father's ghost. The father tells the son that he doesn't realize who he is yet and that he can achieve greatness. The father explains he is alive, as he lives on through his son.
Out in the street, Jonah walk past two boys fighting. The shorter of the two is defending the honor of a small girl (the bigger kid called her a name) and of course, the shorter kid knows what time it is because he is getting his clock cleaned. Jonah steps in to break up the fight, just as the big kid's dad shows up. The guy is a huge moose that ends up taking a swing at Jonah. Jonah reciprocates and smacks the guy right into a horse trough.
Personally speaking, I'm not playing this kinda music just for the sake of the retro-wave. It's not even a problem to me: I like this old-school metal revival and I've always been madly into old-school thrash, death and grind revival. Musically speaking, I wouldn't see myself anywhere else. It seems like a commercial: PLAY FOR PASSION, NOT FOR TREND! But I can't think any other way. And most of all, we are talking about an "elite" sub-genre, I don't know why some people only want to be rockstar playing in a death metal band.
Let the roasted vegetables cool and then cut the red pepper into small pieces on the cutting board with the kitchen knife.
Another vehicle involved in the theft is a 1994 – 2000 black Chevrolet SUV with damage on the front driver side and rear of the vehicle.
Monsters/Villains: The Daleks, Davros
This warm and funny tale of an earnest preppy editor finding himself trapped behind the counter of a Brooklyn convenience store is about family, culture, and identity in an age of discombobulation.
The top is of course, my fourth Sorbetto. I messed up something with the pleat (it's smaller than it should be) but eh, I added lace on the edges to make it look a bit more normal and to make the darn thing lie flat; this cotton sateen did not want to stay down!
In addition, note these three points:
And now, I have just one more card (not Easter related).
In this era, how in the world could 30 professional advertising people not know the click-through rate for display ads?
Who are you elderly man so gaunt and grim, with well-gray’d hair, and
20 THERE are at least 300,000 prisoners of conscience, often held in appalling conditions, sometimes tortured, simply for peacefully expressing their own beliefs.
Off to sleep and its back to the grindstone tomorrow.
SV: Yeah, I was. I thought it was the only place where I could try something. On that lap I think I had too good an exit so got off the corner very well and was too close. I was sitting behind and in that right kink where the old pit building is you cannot do anything there so I was too close to use my momentum later on. I had to lift and I don’t think there was much left. We don’t see the front wing but it was very close but good fun.
The contest question was in 1954's White Christmas starring Bing Crosby, which character wore the dress and which one stayed home?
The noble thief who lives in Sherwood forest stealing from the rich and giving to the poor. My very favorite version of Robin Hood is actually the 1980s TV-show Robin of Sherwood.
Skinner, Gwen - SECRETS OF THE SYMPHONY
In the Coop
“I’m starving!” he said, sniffing the air.
A common expression in Paris at the time of the Synagogue’s construction was “triste comme la Victoire” (as sad as la Victoire), emphasising the quiet and unfashionable aspect of this district. It was also to brighten up this area that Balladur and Lebeigle chose an unusual and colourful shiplike structure for their creation. Balladur had been taught by Sartre at the Lycée Condorcet and was influenced by both Le Corbusier and the German king of minimal, Mies Van Der Rohe. The theories of both architects found their way into this construction. From Van Der Rohe, the skin and bones, the lightness and the clarity. From Le Corbusier, the usage of his modulor system. All of the measurements in this building, from the staircase in the entrance to the balconies on the higher levels were calculated according to Le Corbusier’s theory. This openness and minimalism is certainly not reflected in the heavy stone temple opposite.
I have not outgrown my disbelief re: the world finding Uma Thurman so beautiful.
The answer came as I turned, key in hand, to open my locker.....
WOLF'S BLOOD: FIRE WOLF
The counsellor asked me to describe what had happened in our relationship and for the third or fourth time from a different person, I get the spiel about how much he really must like me but he just couldn’t get over his embarassment. As much as this is nice to think about, it doesn’t help me that X is out there, potentially still as head over heels for me as he seemed to be at the time, even up to the day we broke up. I can’t live with that hanging over my head. I still like him ever so much, but I cannot change him. So that was a sore point.
"It looks like this winter is going to be quite cold," the meteorologist at the weather station responded.
Before we announce the next challenge we need to announce the winner of the last challenge
*Do we recognize talent in an unexpected context?
One dark night, a woman jumps off the rooftop of a high-rise building and bursts into flames. Reporter Kim (Hunter) investigates this strange case of human combustion, only to discover a strange cult dedicated to the Egyptian God Isis. Just another Silent Night, Deadly Night movie, folks.
I'm exhausted, still, and today Joyce and Carl leave. We've been going, going, going and having houseguests and friends still at the hotel and tomorrow will be my first day of "just us" since Christmas.
Denying my flesh,
1. “I think and think and think, I’ve thought myself out of happiness one million times, But never once into it” ~ no better day than today to change this
Juba for my Ma, Juba for my Pa., Juba for my brother-in-law.
If you would like a copy of either of these printables, just leave a comment on this post (be sure to include your email address!) and let me know which sheet you prefer. Also, leave me the name you want included in the header, or if you would prefer it left blank for you to fill in.
And now I talk about this new game announcement. I was expecting Pokemon Grey, but I guess they put a spin on it *coughmoneygrabcough* Not too fond of the name choice though, Pokemon, using numbers in the game titles?! pfft, totally should’ve gone with “Dark Grey” and “Light Grey”.
In fact, to my eyes, the photo in the article suggests a building of cathedral like proportions :)
Even now, vast numbers of us are numb. We are “hearing” but not hearing. We are unchanged in both our life and our knowledge of God, and consequently find ourselves itching for any momentary and engaging novelty. Man shall, after all, “live by every word that proceeds from the mouth of God” and if people are deprived of the Word of God, their spirits will become as gaunt and desperate as the victims of any famine. Is it not here that our deficit of faith, hope, love, patience, forbearance and all the resiliency of our spirit is to be traced?
Police said the Florida Tech student recently spat on a professor at the school, and could face deportation back to Saudi Arabia.
For some months I have had my eye on this CD at the thrift shop I frequent--"I Can't Believe It's Not Satan." Awesome title. The CD selection at this thrift shop is uniformly appalling -- top 40 pop you wouldn't listen to five years ago when it was first released, plus the occasional "inspirational" album -- so this one stood out. Besides the title track, there were songs called "Shit Down Your Neck" and "Cereal and Beer." I figured it had to be pretty bad, but I just kept seeing it there, picking it up, looking at it, and putting it back down. Probably 6 or so times. (No one else wanted it either). Honestly, I can't figure out how it got there because the thrift store is run by a women's organization that you just don't associate with death metal. (I could be wrong, as I will admit that I am a member myself, albeit a sit in the back and roll my eyes during meetings' kind of member).
“It’s 8.3 percent alcohol,” said Ockert. “This is a beer to close the day with, more than an opener!”
Embellishments: Kaiser Pearls, Misc Lace, Misc flowers and TLC Rub-Ons
(So I’ve been trying to write this for the last 25 minutes but the dog and child have been rough housing and it’s very distracting like “Godzilla in your living room” distracting. I think it’s good for both of them to play, wear each other out until…until W gets “hurt” and gets as mad as a hornet's nest and chases poor Ruby Tuesday like he’s going to skin her alive but instead gives up and breaks down in tears of frustration and exhaustion. And you know what I do? I yell at both of them because blogging is hard, people! I yell loud enough for folks in Mexico to hear me and I am not proud of myself. I have to go hug both of them now.)
Since she has a very dark grey leather chair, and LARGE tv in there, I suggested hits of black as well.
Conquer Aspergillosis
"Are you sure you're not exaggerating a little bit there?" If I had a nickel for every time someone has said that to me, I'd be a bazillionaire. At least. For some reason, I tend to either exaggerate or understate whatever it is I want to say. Just a random fact about myself. And of course, the perfect introduction to my new blog: WELCOME to Hyperbole... and stuff!!
We had a fabulous array of entries for our Bugs challenge last week, so much so in fact that I had to ask the Sweeties for some help in picking our Spotlight winner! Between us we decided to go for something we felt was a little different...
Santa Jr. ... Hallmark Channel ... 8 PM
A cabbie classic that one. The cartoon is closer to home. Things go wrong with cabs all the time. Especially with some of the older cabs, a million kilometres on the clock and years of life left in them. Bits rattle loose, one speed bump too many, passengers tinkering with the moving parts, or just old age sneaking up on cab and cabbie alike.
RIYA: A planet settled by the R’il’nai during their original flight from R’il’n. The native fauna, which does not include birds, has evolved from a six-limbed ancestor
I’m not sure how this monthly holiday came about, but who cares, we love it. With Cinco de Mayo this weekend, it’s time to really get our fill of Mexican flavors; starting with – salsa!
At the risk of opening up some old wounds of some of my close friends, when such a situation arose in IITM during my time there, there was a huge uproar. But this died down as soon as a similar Diro speech was given. Things did not improve and the student population, which has grown considerably over the years is open to an even greater risk to significant health concerns.
" Well if we do not have your data from your rewards membership, your phone number, your e-mail or a credit card I can't ring up your sale".
Nails: Finesmith- Nails- shape02- solid series
Over time, these wild horses multiplied until thousands, perhaps millions, roamed the American plains. The US Calvary captured Mustangs from these herds and put them into service, and so did ranchers and farmers. But the wild herds were competing with settlers for land and grass and, by the mid 1800s, Mustangs were being shot on sight and rounded up by the thousands to be slaughtered for food and other products. In 1971, Congress passed the Wild and Free-Roaming Horse and Burro Act which made the controlling and harvesting of Mustangs illegal. But then the Mustang population grew so quickly that control and management of the herds became a major concern. In response to this, the Bureau of Land Management began an adoption program that continues today. However, not all Mustangs are good candidates for adoption and this is where the Black Hills Wild Horse Sanctuary comes into the picture.
I did not finish-plane the boards. I got one side flat enough to feed through my power planer.*
Robert Randolph's set had Ms. Knoxious back on her feet and revved up for some more so we high tailed it to John Butler. He was the only band I saw on the Austin Ventures stage that had great sound. He shredded through a 7 song set (5 of which we actually saw).
gives sufficient proof
And, yes, a short 45 minute presentation is not nearly enough time. So I’ll spend a bit of time highlighting five habits of mind that are crucial for our students to possess:
7. fold in egg white mixture (by hand) in thirds until all egg whites have been incorporated
For this reporter, Ruth Etting is the first of the Bland Bombshells, representing the advent of legions of non-descript performers who were to inhabit American popular culture in the 1940s and 50s. Her saving grace is a voice that is to die for, warm, pleasant and likable, and, on record at least, that is all that matters. She sounded like, and looked like, the girl next door, which of course is the origin of her vaudeville handle. The essence of vaudeville prior to this, however, had been the colorful, individual character. Costumed, distinctive, and, yes, mannered. Posh or earthy, the mere mention of the name conjured up a personality: Nora Bayes, Eva Tanguay, Sophie Tucker, Fanny Brice, Beatrice Lillie…to name just a few. Henceforth, it was to become an industry where a pretty girl could get up onstage, smile ingratiatingly, and just sing. She might have the best voice in the world…but without that indispensable persona, we would forget about her the instant she walked off the stage. She was disposable.
An investigation into whether police set out to kill was carried out in the years after the incidents by former Greater Manchester Police deputy chief constable John Stalker and Sir Colin Sampson of West Yorkshire Police.
99. XTC - Ella Guru (2:32)
g) contains aspersions against or ridicules the organs of the State
10. The most rewarding thing about blogging for you?
These two Bible scholars believe that scripture memorization is worthwhile and important, but what does the Bible say about the topic? Here are two reasons why I should make scripture memorization a priority:
- Rain water collection with earthwork
And so, there you have it – a public in love with its own enslavement. A nation that obeys robots and digital requests for payment of fines for committing no offense against any other people, and for not damaging anyone’s property.
Regarding the subjective genitive phrase “through the faith of Christ,” as opposed to, the objective genitive “through faith in Christ” in 3:9, Cousar takes a safe neutral opinion and concludes that it is inconclusive. For Christians of the Reformation, the tendency is to lean toward a reading of “through faith in Christ.” Personally, this is my theological tendency. However, after reading commentaries on Romans and Galatians regarding this same issue, I, too, remain inconclusive…maybe even more confused or uncertain, which can be a good thing sometimes.
Tuesday 7th -
By the way, the immersion blender is on my wish list!!!
And now for the winners of last weeks contest!
Pass the plastic firetruck to mommy.
James replied with carefully calculated thoughts, “It’s the only life I know.”
44. Nineteen Eighty-Four - George Orwell
I find it damn annoying that these services charge double to listen on a smartphone. A smartphone is just another computer.
which is fresh now,
Maybe no one will understand. Maybe not even one single person will learn anything from the things that taught me so much. Maybe my words won't do the trip justice. Maybe no one cares about the trip. Maybe no one will read and listen.
Franck Vaillant (drums)
I've never been further south than Florida. I love warm weather, yes, but I don't have a lot of money, so I can't travel to those warm places as often as I'd like to. One of my colleagues focuses on academic scholarship related to Latin America, and it always sounds so interesting. I was captivated when I received the following mission from one of my Latin American Affiliated Agents. Did you know that it's winter in August in Peru?
and she was really feeling sorry for
Smiles & thanks, Shelley
Fischer, R. (1993). Fibonacci applications and strategies for traders. New York, J. Wiley.
Peace and luv!
Now I've had it up to here
Something which has been bothering me for a while now is how I find it increasingly difficult to put pen to paper and I accuse Microsoft Word for this (spell check is surprisingly handicapping). I have become so comfortable with reading and writing on my computer that I feel guilty when I look at my unread books and unused notebooks. Television and other media are constantly winning over print. All things digital is the new cult. Everywhere you see people are whizzing online greeting cards to their close ones, shifting their work to their monitor, paying bills through internet, ordering dresses and adopting a tiger cub online. What is not yet digital is our body and our soul and they soon maybe as we are developing a contraption for everything, everyday. I guess the ‘I, Robot’ scenario is not that distant after all. Our humanity is what is the most inflicted with this epidemic of digitization. We are losing touch with our inner side, with nature, with other people, with life. The ‘digitized generation of today’ is not a subject that is totally grim though. There is scope of improvement always and if we are able to strike a balance between ourselves and our machines, I bet we shall survive. And if we don’t, I guess we will need to clone Will Smith for the cataclysm that awaits us.
This week I tackled a long procrastinated project - sorting through the hundreds of vintage photos I've stockpiled over the last several months. I needed to go through them all and pick out which ones I wanted to list individually in my vintage photo shop on Etsy. Talk about a job... I did it though - so look for some new stuff to be added to that much neglected little shop of mine soon!
were a lot of tracks I wanted guitar in and I felt a bit
the ground we once lived on.
Anyone who wishes to explore the possibility (from a non-biblical point of view) that there were two separate creation events on this earth, need only research the origins of domestic “farm” animals. You will quickly discover that these animals did not have their origins in Africa.
We really wanted to check out the old courthouse because I hear it's beautiful inside, but we decided to call it a day. The kids had been awesome all day and we didn't want to jinx it, so we took them back to the hotel for a quick swim before dinner. We headed to Fitz's American Grill and Bottling Works. This place might be nice for lunch, but it's not as family friendly late on a Friday night. It's located on a strip that's very "college townish". Neat atmosphere and cool looking shops, and tons of kids just hanging out. Since we have a full schedule tomorrow and Clay had to pee AGAIN (I swear he has the bladder the size of a lentil), we came back to the hotel to sleep. Well, most of us are sleeping. Some of us are blogging. Still others are goofing off. And one in particular (I won't name names, but it starts with an "A") is apparently still feeling the effects of the White Castle.
market was going up!”
Landscape season is here, a month early! And I have been hopping, hence silent. The good news is that client demand is high........could we really be seeing the turn in the economy all of us have been hoping for?
Typically, the patient sits for 30 minutes next to a 10,000-lux box (which is about 50 times as bright as an ordinary indoor light). Light therapy is safe for most people, but those with eye diseases should consult a healthcare professional before undergoing the treatment.
the moments of joy and disappointment dissipates soon,
consults on leadership and organizational development when not capturing or producing beautiful images.
Things have come to a pretty pass,
No, no one is saying that.
The waitress returned and as Hank and Bobbie-Joe started to order she queried, “Are y’all from Australia? Cos I watched a movie last night with an Australian in it, well it was an American actor but he was playing an Australian and y’all accents sound the same”. She was delighted when, despite the American sounding names, Hank and Bobbie-Joe were in fact, Australians. With a giggle, the waitress resumed taking the order.
I wanted to suggest this course to the Intute management and had many new ideas to propose, some of which were admittedly partially-baked, but was prevented from doing so, under threat of disciplinary action if I did so, by my boss at that time. Not only that, but I remember him saying that our institution’s contribution to Intute should be only to catalogue Internet resources. The best I can say about his attitude on the matter is that either he had little vision, or that he thought Intute was doomed to close in the near future anyway, so why not just keep a couple of people employed on it until that time when it inevitably folded.
Dec. 17: SCANDINAVIAN CHRISTMAS CUSTOMS (featuring Norwegian holiday art)
Speciesism, sexism, racism, and heterosexism are all bigotries rooted in the same underlying confusion that ignores morally relevant characteristics, like sentience or interest, in favor of morally irrelevant characteristics, like species or race, in providing equal consideration to others. And yet so many people are strong, passionate advocates trying to eliminate one or more of these prejudices while ironically scoffing at another. It is common to see feminists, LGBT activists, and civil rights advocates ridicule concern over speciesism while blithely ignoring the underlying implications of their dismissal. Many condemn the bigotry of others, but cannot see their own.
and it set my little hamster wheel turning in my head.
The creation of a flexible carbon-trading system was important for the airlines, too.
· They believe in a one world religion operating in sync with a one world government.
"I would like to appeal to the government to give our people jobs and job opportunities in the same concept of black economic empowerment," Kok said.
whether we believe it or not.
#19-Lalkygirl
"If a guy's not wearing a hat, then he could be on any team we want", said Topps. (A paraphrase of something that I'm sure was said at Topps headquarters in the '60s.)
In my marriage, there has been a change in the kind of sex we have over the years. It has become more predictable, like a dance- you roll this way, put your hand here yadda, yadda, yadda...
Breathe this air.
More excitingly, we had a lesson at the beginning of this week with Wiola, whose blog I have been reading for the last 2 and a half years. It was a really interesting lesson; we've been having real problems with crookedness recently. Well, I say WE, but in fact I'm really the one with the crookedness - Echo can't hope to be straight if I'm not! Wiola came over for the day to see if we could sort out what my problems are.
feels amputee
It was just after Tom began to have his confidence about his love for Marge who used to be a lover of Phillip, and murmured, " Plein soleil", looking up at the sky.
Based on the first 50 pages, I would recommend both of these books. But if I could only continue reading one of them, I know which I would choose.
After rehearsals, we decided to go to Unclaimed Baggage. I am right between sizes and have 3 pairs of pants that fit. We need some stuff for camping, I wanted to get a couple messenger bags for the boys and so on. So off we went. Us and 93% of the rest of Northern Alabama. It was wall-to-wall people, the racks were being picked over and people were in line to be next to go through them. We picked up a pillow and 2 stuff sacks and hit the road.
It’s been a crazy crazy week, and amazingly we’ve only had ONE visit to a doctor!! We finally got the ball rolling on getting our house on the market, so we’ve been work-work-working and not doing much of anything else!
It was only 40 baht (a little over US $1) and very delicious, adapted from Burmese curry which is influenced by Indian spices.
You don’t have to have a blog to play along with the sketch challenge. If you upload your project to any on-line galleries or forums, please use the keyword of WMSC74. Better yet, why not upload it to your album in the Waltzingmouse Stamps Gallery?
El Tesoro de Don Felipe Tequila Añejo – Tequila Tapatio
course, just doing exercise puts you in a much better state of mind.
Deleuze, Gilles. “Postscript on Control Societies.” Negotiation 1972-1990. Trans. Martin Joughin. New York: Columbia UP, 1995. 177-82.
Steve Hiebert was working in his second-floor office Friday morning when he saw the woman down in the parking lot, peeking in cars.
Cat’s Eyes – I Knew It Was Over (V2)
2.They Pay. I don’t mean prostitutes (That’s a whole other story). They don’t mind paying for dinner, they don’t grumble over who owes what at dinner with friends and even fight to pay the bill. They buy their parents and girlfriends gifts even when it’s not a special occasion.
You know its not easy admitting you need help, people view it as a sign of insecurity or weakness. Its hard for a proud self sustaining man to say that he is afraid of something. Its hard for an independent career driven woman to ask for help when she is stuck. Its hard for kids who are afraid of water to watch their friends frolic in the deep end without them. People laugh at you when you find something hard.
Growing up in Oregon, with friends and family in California, I spent more hours on Interstate 5 than I care to remember. As an adult, I now find myself loading the kids into the family Truckster and heading down that endless ribbon of asphalt at least twice a year.
we have information on that
Ok, enough of that! I'll clean it up now! Next was the Light Show which is held in the grand hall of Macy's. At one time there used to be fountains which moved along with the music, but I think it got to expensive to do that and they stopped them sometime back in 2001. Over the last 10 years parts of the display disappeared because it was literally falling apart, but now everything has been replaced by newer technology, but still being respectful of the original design of the show.
I provide independent general counsel services to growing and established businesses. The role of "independent general counsel" can be structured in a variety of ways, and can evolve with your company’s needs.
Then add the cucumber slices (please ignore the peel on some of those cukes in the picture. This was my first batch...before I realized the error of my ways...). Now put a lid on your container and "shake it like crazy".
We walked slowly, SJ with his arthritic bones couldn’t go very fast. B, the older dog, still thought he was three… We reached the top of the hill, paused to admire the view and sniff the scents. It was three in the afternoon. There were no other walkers. Not a good thing. It is wise to be wary when taking a stroll. It is not a time for reflection or meditation. This is South Africa…
My novel, In the Echo of the Ocean, wouldn’t have been written if I lived in any other place. Even though the story is more about people than the ocean, I hope the sound of the waves and adventure can still be heard through the pages.
1910 W. Temple Street
Got to get this day started,need to check on my kelly,haven’t heard from her in couple days,Bear needs his walk and I need another cup of R.V.coffee,be safe on the roads,sending all good things your way,
some of these flying monsters are misidentified frigatebirds?
To make the frosting, combine the cream cheese and butter in the bowl of an electric mixer. Beat on medium-high speed until well combined and smooth, about 2-3 minutes. Mix in the vanilla extract. Gradually beat in the confectioners’ sugar until totally incorporated, increase the speed and then beat until smooth. Frost cooled cupcakes as desired. (I used a large, unlabeled star tip to frost these cupcakes.)
Roll dough into scant 1-inch balls and roll in white granulated sugar. Bake on an ungreased baking sheet in a preheated 350-degree oven for 10 to 12 minutes.
When I think of examples on the first schism in Judaism, I find many and from various periods of time. During the Biblical times the obvious example is that of the Samarians and the Judeans. During the time of the Second Temple there are the schisms between the Pharisees and the Sadducees, the Essenes and the other Jewish groups (in regards to the status of the Temple as well as the priesthood of the Essenes), and later on between the Rabbinic Jews and the Karaites. Today we might even talk about the schism between the Orthodox on the one hand and the Reform on the other (with the Conservative movement somewhere in between). What is worthwhile to notice here is that we are talking about schisms, which emphasis the struggle on who are the right ones to define what “true Judaism” is, that is, where do we put the limits. That is also the case in the Islamic schism between the Sunnis and the Shi’as. Of course, which I dare say is obvious, it doesn’t mean that the two parts in each schism, whether Jewish or Muslim, denies the other side’s right to leave an imprint on the religion, as well as the case can be that sometimes the one part denies the other side’s right, while the other side acknowledge the right of the first side.
1. New White CoolRoof Installed.
Last night they aired the feature. I have to admit it was a little strange watching ourselves on TV, but it made me so happy to see my little girl on TV. Our son Jonathan was more than thrilled to see himself on TV as well. It made me so proud when they first showed the picture of Mikayla on TV and I asked him who that was....without hesitation he yelled, "Baby Mikayla!" He is such a proud big brother, I only hope that one day God gives him the opportunity to have a sibling on earth as well as his siblings in Heaven. I love that to him, it is just his sister and that she is still part of his life in some way.
In the mean time the members of National Human Rights Commission (NHRC) visited our area and took stock of the situation. It has found the breach of promise by the government made to the people whose lands have been taken and said improper rehabilitation and not providing regular allowance until employment is given to people amount to human rights violation. While we appreciate the note taken by NHRC, we demand that forceful usurpation of sources of livelihood of people is still more serious form of human rights violation and NHRC should take note of this.
Establish a firm spending plan on your red gown order. Earlier than purchasing in department shops or boutiques, peruse this season's options of attire on the net to determine the retail value of your dress. Cocktail dress costs can get started at $75, if bought at a consignment shop or off-price retailer, but can value from the minimal thousands of dollars if acquired at a high-end office keep.
The band have built up a good reputation amongst Stoke’s vibrant local music scene and have a number of followers.
I am jittery and pissy and totally on edge.
We had plans to use the basement as a painting studio for the kids. We also wanted it to be a place where they could use riding vehicles on stormy days. We were on a great path organizing the space with shelving systems and bins, then fell off the wagon.
I have loved PencilLines blog for some time now. I haven't really had an opportunity to play along until I was asked to guest design for them back in November of last year. I am hooked now! The current sketch is so cute! I love the banner! Here is the sketch:
Alex has fine tuned the use of various hoes and he walks his garden beds daily, hoe in hand, swiftly and easily removing even the tiniest weed, constantly sharpening the blade. Everything is planted with the hand held hoe in mind and the paths are the width of a larger hoe. Alex looks healthy and vibrant and loves his work.
"The expectation was that the speaker would release the report," an Ethics Committee member told The Post.
My new classes will be Writing 101 and Lighting for Photography I. I am actually excited about both. I definitely want to brush up on some writing technicalities, and the Lighting class is not just about studio lighting but light itself. The class is so popular that I almost lost my chance to get in by not registering the day registration opened. I feel kind of bad about the way I got in, because it was that students were dropped out of the class for non-payment and I swooped in on one of their spots. Is it strange to feel bad about that while still feeling totally excited?
2. Bob In Your Gait
2) Making your own extensions~:
Beck’s buffoonification is complete, and he and his lackeys are back in jail by episode’s end. Its a nice breather after the intensity of last episode, and a drink before the war, if you will.
"Hey hot stuff!"
Again,,,,if you haven't yet entered my Giveaway, you can scroll down a couple of posts to do so....... Have a great Weekend!
I feel bad for her 'cause she really enjoyed makin' baby clothes n' stuff. Unfortunately, surgery to fix the carpal tunnel is at least two or three years away (welcome to socialized healthcare).
The beast was at most 20 feet from him.
feels like walking with Charlotte
David and co. made a statement early, but failed to capitalize in a double digit lead at the last 6 minute of the game, losing via Parada’s putback in the OT. 4-4.
This is one of the surest ways that the MDGs, in particular, by reducing poverty by half, by 2015 can have a proven multiplier effect of progress across all the MDGs. It is instructive that poverty remains a time bomb in every economy and failure to tackle it can lead to horrendous consequences. This should not be lost on government. As a result, the MDGs Action plan as enunciated by the United Nations should be implemented with all sincerity of purpose.
One of my passions and greatest joys in writing is world building. Making maps and designing towns and thinking up the perfect places for scenes. Right down to magical herbs or mythical creatures. I love it all.
Here’s video of Anna’s big Santa meeting (I apologize for the shakiness of the video – FLIP camera kinda sucks):
Starring: James Mason,
Biggest revelation: I am strong! Much, much stronger than I ever imagined! Regardless of the physical pains I’ve endured here, I’ve maintained a positive attitude for the most part! I’ve figured out how to get from here to there and back again on my own. When the need for help arose, I asked for and accepted it graciously. When I was scared, I searched inside for strength and found it! And when I was lonely, I let myself feel loneliness and recognize it could be as short-lived as I wanted it to be! There have been people in my life who said I lack self-confidence. Maybe I projected that because I felt the need to be what was expected of me at the time. Travelling alone, I found the space to be just me and found that they were wrong about me. I AM STRONG!!
Perhaps with all the focus on trying to conform to the wishes of the major publishers, writers lose their individuality, their voice, their uniqueness. And no, I am not condoning sloppy writing. No matter how iconoclastic we are, we still need to get our points across, and one does that with good grammar, great word choice, and proper punctuation.
Here I had been planning, organizing, cooking, and shopping for BIG GIRL EARRINGS…and he wasn’t even sure if we had PLANS!!?? Silently, I kicked myself for falling into this situation once again. I mentally slapped myself, and then slapped myself again for thinking this was more than it was. My head throbbed from the stupidity of the moment…and my ears throbbed from having earrings shoved through them where the holes used to be.
Me: “…it was meant as a history buff or a lover of history…” Being a history buff is NOT enough to say things like the bible is a viable historical document. It’s just not. But you called yourself a historian, not a history buff. If your definition of a historian is someone who likes history and enjoys reading historical things, then I’m a historian too. Using your logic, I’m also a gynaecologist.
So I click ok….
When completed, two new spans with a total of nine vehicle lanes and paths for pedestrians and bikes will replace the original structure.
Wait! it gets better : "Casu marzu is considered toxic when the maggots in the cheese have died. Because of this, only cheese in which the maggots are still alive is eaten" (from Wikipedia)
Alright, here's my review of the recipe: SO DELISH! The crumb was perfect- just like velvet in your mouth, as promised! The flavors came together really well and complimented each other. As it turned out, it was actually a blessing that I ran out of buttercream, because the white chocolate ended up being a great addition to the cake!
Ask what the employee thinks he or she can do to improve the situation, and then what action the employee is willing to commit to.
I was thinking recently about “good guys.” In Star Wars (don’t worry; this isn’t a Star Wars post!), it should be clear that jedi are good guys and empire are bad guys, though Bioware screwed that up with having evil jedi and good imperials (a debate for another day). In thinking on that line, I started to think about WoW and its playable races, and it struck me to do a breakdown of what races appear as bad guys more often and what races appear as good guys.
It is perfect for entertaining large groups...they can open up those doors and it makes a nice large space!
They had started off together to explore something that promised to be wonderful, and, of course, there had been wonderful times. And yet, thought Mrs Bridge, why is that we haven’t — that nothing has — that whatever we — ?
Serving size: 2 Tablespoons (12 grams)
How’d it go: After my long day of moving, I went to the driving range for an hour! Once again, since it’s a light day to begin, this will suffice(I would NEVER count this if it was a regular cardio day!)
But then whenever I go upstairs during the day, I end up turning lights off in Kyle's sink area, their shared bath, Amanda's bedroom and closet.
Like the time I was hauling a 40 lb bag of kitty litter out of the back of my SUV.
8:03: I confiscate the baby lotion from Junebug, who was trying to paint a picture on the carpet with it. I send everyone down to the schoolroom with the instructions of clearing the table so we can do school.
You may or may not be aware of the issues surrounding The Story Siren and plagiarism over the last few weeks. I'm not going to repeat the whole situation - if you're unaware of what I'm talking about, Reading With Martini's post about her own thoughts with links to all the posts that supply the necessary information about the situation.
When I (we) brought our first child home from the hospital, it didn't take me long to realize how important nap time was to him. As he grew older, I realized his nap times were even more important to me.
Instead, use an old T-shirt. Your hair will love you for it!!
Your scary stories can be rooted in fiction or in spooky real life experiences. In previous weeks we have received recipes suggestions such as “witches eyeballs” and “chocolate chip pumpkin muffins”. It’s totally up to you – but the wackier the better!
Betty or Susie, whatever her name is puts me on hold and comes back. "Ma'am, there is some light on the horizon for you. This vehicle is equipped with On Star service, so they may be able to unlock your car remotely and not have to send some one out. Give me a minute to contact On Star and see what we can do." The line goes silent. My sniffles and sobs slow. Michael watches me slowly and controlled wondering what in the world crazy Mommy will do next.
animal fibers, anything that is 100% will do).
3 folded and tied up bed sheets
The hardware is truly impressive
Prov. 17:22 A happy heart is good medicine and a cheerful mind works healing, but a broken spirit dries up the bones.
And that was it. Once again, I attempt to make something challenging and end up wanting to take another crack at it sometime in the future. We’ll see, its not tops on my list of redos at the moment.
Happy querying!
I’m loving Skype. Since I can’t see family and friends in a short car ride I am relying on Skype to keep me up-to-date with what in going on with everyone. Thank goodness for video chat! Moving would have been a lot harder before it.
What more can I say.
The sorrow in his eyes burned,
Keep living!
Yesterday was the first day and it was rough. Cameron was not liking it at all. I nursed her first at every feeding but I had to supplement with a bottle after almost every session. Today has been totally different though, I have yet to give her a bottle and it's almost 4 o'clock! Once she got used to it she started to do really well. She will still get bottled breast milk probably once or twice a day so Josh has a chance to feed her and to get a fortified bottle along with her vitamins (and maybe so I can have a break) but other than that she will be a nursing baby. I've always wanted so badly to be able to nurse for the bonding experience and I think I'm finally going to get my chance! I had really given up hope on making the switch but I'm putting my head down and doing it. I'm setting small goals so I don't get frustrated and literally taking it feeding by feeding. My goal for the next feed is to nurse her for the whole feed. It's that simple. I've taken that attitude for the whole day and before I knew it, I had solely nursed her for 4 feedings in a row! It's very exciting. But enough about that.
this one in particular i must have learned in sunday school & i hear the line over & over in my head when i'm talking to doctors & planning surgeries, or even when we think about how long we will have isaac with us:
y el tañer doloroso de una vieja campana.
And yes, I think we actually said it that loud and that enunciated.
Apparently it all started with a tip off from a friend of Wills, and now Richard Cheese and Lounge Against The Machine will perform a set of their swankified versions of Rap, Metal and other inappropriate tunes at Buckingham Palace! They go on at around 12.30pm, just after the happy (?) couple arrive from the ceremony. The band have even been invited to stay at Buck House overnight... in a suite used for visiting dignitaries!
Sun, 1am: Drunk, tired, get yourself home. Get yourself to bed.
Muchenje
we dip the eggs in the dye
14. Redman – Rock the Spot
It’s unclear whether the ACLU will accept the judge’s offered compromise, since the six remaining commandments came from the God Who is not supposed to be mentioned on government property, even though it’s part of the universe that He created.
Supposing one's husband is an ordinary gentleman holding no particular office......does that mean one holds no social status whatsoever? Ah well......I know my place.
5 who does not put out his money at interest, and does not take a bribe against the innocent. He who does these things shall never be moved.
Reached KLIA at about 3pm. My sis's hubby picked us up. End of a holiday...
‘You gave an old woman a little moment of joy,’ she said. ‘Thank you.’
They were talking all hot and heavy like they were preparing for a war or something. LOL, yes, I have a crazy imagination, I know. But they all look like they could be, I dunno, Navy Seals or something? I wouldn’t turn my nose up at any of them, but I don’t care what anyone says, Brice is the hottest one of them all.
Making adjustments is a good thing in that it can help you maintain morale. In my first years of playing golf (a.k.a., the “Dark Decade”), I was lucky to break 100. It was such a frustrating game then, and if I hadn’t seen the possibility of “true” scores in the 90s, I would have given up. When I reached the 90s, I began to see “true” 80s scores beckoning. Now I spend most of my time in the 80s, but the 70s wink at me from time to time. My “true” scores have motivated me to improve in the areas of my stupidest swings, so I make fewer of them. My “true” scores also motivated me to get lessons, so a professional could help me get over the self-defeating things I was doing.
I find that it's easier to get a good looking mat when your doing a torn edge if you adhere the top layer down before you tear the top edge so you know how far to tear down without having to guess.
I love The Rock. Outside of Shawn Michaels he is my 2nd favorite wrestler of all time. His promo work is unrivaled and his matches were always entertaining. He seemingly lost more big time matches than he won (something that Cena does not do), he sold injuries and he always wavered between heel and face without hesitation. I don’t care why he came back to do this match, I am just happy that the man is back! I also don’t care if he stays, but I suspect this won’t be the last we see of the The Rock in a WWE ring.
1. Eric Beetner, author of One Too Many Blows to the head is sponsoring an ebook contest for the new releases from Second Wind Publishing. To win a Daughter Am I ebook, all you have to do it go to the Second Wind blog and answer the question: “have you ever learned something shocking about your past? Maybe not murder but what rocked your world once you found out?” I know you have learned something that rocked your world — for example, how did you feel when you found out where you (and all babies) came from? See, it’s not so hard! You can also answer another question to win an ebook of One Too Many Blows to the Head by J.B. Kohl and Eric Beetner and a third question to win a copy of False Positive by JJ Dare.
This is
And if you really can't drag your butt out to buy the book or see the exhibit, you should definitely be checking out their blog, which has lots of historic tidbits. For Presidents Day, for example, they post that "every president from Cleveland to Truman appeared at the Academy. FDR, who spoke here 10 times, drew the largest recorded crowd in BAM history—7,000, with the approximately 4,800 who couldn't be seated spilling onto Lafayette Avenue."
One of them denied him
We know his wife was Halinka or Zorinka and their daughter was Sofi. He had an Uncle Herbert and he mentions Franz and Zelda and Heinrich and Forenski.
There are hundreds more items that I didn’t have room to feature – search the Etsy listings for ‘FHFteam’ to see more!
That aesthetic carried over to the three song ep this compilation shares it's namesake with. In addition to the title cut which became a fan favorite, the record also included the Primitons faithful reading of The Left Banke's "Something On My Mind." By the time they got around to recording their second and final album, Happy All the Time, Roden's six-string wrangling was buttressed with considerably more musculature, but that extra buzzsaw grit didn't diminish the Primitons rich, resonant arrangements and melodic moxie (although per the liner notes, many fans had a preference to the first record over Happy). A dozen-and-a-half song oeuvre is slim no matter how you slice it, but the band make every moment count, and so far as these ears are concerned, they could throw down with the best of what their like-minded contemporaries Tommy Keene and The Plimsouls had to give. The Primitons body of work is that considerable and praiseworthy.
19But some Jews came to that place from Antioch and Iconium, and got control over the people; and after stoning Paul, they had him pulled out of the town, taking him for dead.
Too much of a good thing,
To be honest, it was not the first time that I had thought about her. I had gone back to French Guiana a couple of times in the last few years, and every time she would pop into my mind, but ever so gently… and likewise that thought would dissipate in the effervescence of parties and excursions.
Rotas newest cool concave wheel:500 for all 4
Ragnar Cape Cod was chaotic, exhausting, challenging, hilarious and strange....I wouldn't change a minute of it! I am SO glad I did it!
So I wasn't sure quite how to approach this, as I took almost 800 photos of my trip to Sardinia. I decided that the easiest way for me to post some pics was to first give you a general photo overview from the places on the island that I traveled to and then with each subsequent post, give more detail on those individual places/regions that I saw. Also to help, I thought I would give you a google map to give you an idea of the geography that was covered, Its at the very bottom of this post. I will link in more info on each place as I post on them to give a more in depth idea on the sights.
What I wanted to do was to look at the evidence given by DCS Williams of the Metropolitan Police in the Tommy Sheridan trial to see what it told us at that stage (December 2010) about what the police had actually uncovered as part of Operation Caryatid.
nor can we pretend that we are free
Morning, chickens, and welcome to the weekend.
Well hello lovely readers! Today joining us for Fashion Files
1 boyhood
After a moment’s consideration, I set spiders to stringing webs around the balconies as well. When capes were in the cards, I couldn’t afford to ignore the possibility of grappling hooks, rappelling, teleportation or flight. The spiders would sense any movement of the webs, and I could sense what the spiders did, in turn.
6. I might have upset my husband when I put his "badass hunting dog" in a pretty pink tutu and tiara. So, I might have had to buy the dogs a second round of Halloween costumes that were "tougher." This might be a stretch.
Stamps: Flight of The Butterfly
for me writing is a gathering of emotions, words, something i see ... simply being attentive to what is around, near me in a given day and taking note of what strikes me . i've learned over the years that being attentive is absolutely one of the most valuable things you do as a writer . i carry a notebook with me always and scribble down anything that spurs a tinge of fascination . it's that initial fascination for me that sparks a song, in time . and when a song is ready to be seen/heard, all the gatherings come together, coincide, spill all over the piano .
He loved the way she laughed and the way she teased him, and challenged him sometimes. She challenged him more in the beginning. Nothing was easy; she was a conquest. Now, she was a given.
Best moment of the week: Christmas was pretty cool. We got a few things for Joseph from my family, and it was so neat and precious to get little boy stuffs. We got some bath gear from my cousins, and an adorable little outfit from my aunt and uncle. I love, love, love it!
My husband shed light on the part of me that I would rather not acknowledge. The part that is not so happy all the time, is quick to anger, and has a sharp tongue--yeah that part. Unfortunately, the one who deserves my best self, oftentimes receives my worst. He was not saying anything out of meanness, rather, he was sharing with me what I have been trying to hide from. It seems as though the hubbub of life dominates our conversations--bills, house projects, grocery lists, work and school.
The mask sheet, itself, is quite large and felt really thick and course. Additionally, it still had the eye-hole bits still intact with the mask and it was difficult to rip off so I just left them on them and folded them down do they didn't cover my eyes (HAHAHA!)
The giveaway is open to everyone. A US winner will receive a print copy, while an international winner will receive an electronic copy. You must be 18 years of age or older to participate. Void where prohibited by law. Giveaway rules are subject to change.
"Give peace a chance!"
Well, ShopNBC was full of news today. Some was good, but a lot was bad.
They are keeping well in the salad drawer the fridge. Small Oca roasted whole become squishy and extra lemony...and slightly insect grub like if I am to be completely honest. This may put you off, or you may want to use it as a selling point to young children who like to pretend that spaghetti is worms and tapioca is frogspawn. Larger roasted Oca resemble lemony waxy potatoes. I have added them to stews with other roots vegetables and they retain the delicate lemon flavour. Their crunchy waxy texture is similar to water chestnuts when sliced and added to a stir fry. They are delicious and very versatile.
Patty and I share our stories, our struggles and mostly our blessings. It’s a paradox. Being in service, focused on helping a particular group, changes and blesses your life in ways that you cannot imagine. It informs gratitude and opens your heart wider than you thought possible. I write every day, because I cannot teach a creative writing class and not walk the talk. The women I teach keep me accountable, and help me grow as a writer. That’s an important premise in service: the people you serve keep you accountable to become a better human being.
3. Tomorrow is Saturday.
"I think they were concerned about people standing around because Normanton has always been a safe Labour seat. We were not telling people who to vote for because we know the rules."
This is the point where I write a synopsis, which is a summary of the book. A synopsis introduces your characters, their goals, motivations, and conflicts, and shows the progression of the book to the end. If you really hate writing a synopsis, here is where you can use other techniques. You can post plot points on a board or make outlines based on different plotting methods, such as the turning-point method (a book is divided into 3 or 4 "acts," each separated by a plot turning point), or the Hero’s Journey. The key for me at this point is to lay out the plot from beginning to end. I like the synopsis because it allows me to show the emotional impact on the characters of each point in the plot.
Oh yeah, if you’ve not seen the most recent episodes there will likely be spoilers, plus you probably need to have seen the said thing to know what I’m on about, otherwise, it might be a bit pointless for you.
James Casbolt (I am not sure if it is the original Casbolt or one of his many clones) has informed me about some truly dark stuff going on in British Intelligence. Here is his email:
It’s like finishing a book… you just find another book. Or the end of a movie, you wait until another one comes out and you go see that one. It’s not that big of a deal for me.
My mom and I had been to several places looking for that perfect dress. I was nearing the end of my rope. We decided to go to Phipps Plaza (which is an uppity mall here in Atlanta). We entered some boutique, which I am sure is closed by now, and began to look around.
My latest chocolate love is a variety of dark Mexican Oaxaca (pronounced wah-ha-kah). It's chocolate that's seasoned with chipotle flavors and cayenne pepper. Some people might think it sounds weird, but it adds a really clean, refreshing finish. It's not like you're sitting there begging for water because it's so spicy. Think of it as more of an afterthought than an overpowering flavor. Jacques Torres understands my love, and has addressed my love with his trademark flavor called "Wicked" - his take on Oaxaca. Even better, he took that flavor and made it into Ice Cream. So on our little adventure through three boroughs yesterday, Lauren and I stumbled upon the Jacques Torres location in DUMBO (the neighborhood in Brooklyn, not the elephant). It was instantly deemed necessary for me to eat something. We grabbed some Wicked ice cream and sat on the rocks over in the park, 10 feet from the water and watched the sun set over the Brooklyn bridge and New York skyline. This is one of the millions of reasons why I love New York.
Trestut le cors a la tere li justet.
This may sound rather dramatic. Actually, it is. This is a time, unprecedented in human history. On the esoteric level, we are told we asked to come and to be here –incarnate– at this time. On the psychic level, we are sensing a coming-together of many traditions, a meeting of minds from many populations and backgrounds. Many spiritual leaders of the world’s diverse faiths are encouraging us –willing us to take the plunge.
She wants all my time and attention.
This is not just a question of taste. It seems to me that the real purpose of stories and reading is to take you out of yourself and put you somewhere else. Anything that is made to be sold to a particular demographic, however, will always end up reflecting the superficial concerns of that demographic. Exactly: books are for stretching you, growing you, educating you - for adults, too, which is why I've always questioned any publishing marketing philosophy based on the notion of simply catering for an already established need, of which the proposed age-banding is just the latest form. Simon Juden, chief exec of the Publishers Association is being disingenuous when he argues for it as a philanthropic gesture towards children and their parents: 'We don't want a child not to be bought a book as a present because the adult doesn't know where to start'; and it is depressing that critics of the 'No to Age-banding' campaign on the Guardian books blog appear to have swallowed this wholesale and in their clamorous endorsement of such 'help' for parents have revealed a regrettably blinkered - if not I'm-alright-Jack - view of the matter of children and reading:
Vince Gill: If I Die
So it is with our foundational faith if we are grounded in the Rock, Christ Jesus. Our emotions change with our ever-changing circumstances, but beneath the tears or laughter, our fears or joy, we rely on the Truth of God’s Word to keep us from despair with life or over-confidence in ourselves.
Nickolas wouldn't be where he is without that wheelchair! He came into himself, learned independence in his wheelchair. Somehow I don't think that the need for a wheelchair would be realized or verbalized with a clinic visit every 9 months. And Grandview has been no help in this area. It was something that we didn't even know we needed until it was suggested - at baby group.
1 1/2 cups self-raising flour
and fill it with profanity.
This year's Experimental consist of two bourbons with different secondary grains (the grain added in addition to corn and a small amount of barley malt). One uses oats and the other uses rice.
Exclusion from employment also means that you are excluded from “benefits”, such as social security, medi-care, pension plans, 401k’s, vacation pay, medical & dental plans, etc. Instead, the church will provide financial counseling, spiritual counseling, physical counseling, and teach you how to trust in the provision of Jesus Christ. (Why should this be so difficult? How did we get here? All of these programs were not part of or around for our great grandparents.) We will counsel with you and show you how to get your own benefits with your extra money.
They were told to gather enough for each person, about two quarts per person; gathering enough for everyone in their tent. Moses told the people that on Sabbath, a day of rest, a holy Sabbath to Yahweh; that they were not to gather any of the manna, the bread from heaven. They were told that whatever they planned to bake, they were to bake on preparation day (Friday) and whatever they planned to boil, to do the same and then set aside the leftovers until morning. In addition, the people went about, and gathered it, and ground it in mills, or beat it in a mortar, and baked it in pans, and made cakes of it: and the taste of it was as the taste of fresh oil. They set aside what was left until morning, as Moses had commanded. It did not smell bad and there were no worms in it.
A charge Ms. Greeney said "scapegoated" her committee.
I finally staged an intervention for her with all of her kids at my house. All the grown daughters were angry and depressed and everyone cried. They felt crushed and betrayed, and although sympathetic to their mother’s plight, they wanted the fighting between their parents to stop. They said it was unbearable for them. After listening to her children, Annie finally grasped that her antics were hurting her relationship with them.
I made the flower using Joanne Leddy's way - they always turn out beautifully. Joanne does the most gorgeous work with Stampin' Up! products - so different and interesting! I used various SU punches and an SU pearl in the centre and the whole flower has been sprayed with shimmer spray.
Him and I, both the oldest with two younger brothers. I could empathize with him. I knew what I would be feeling, what I would believe my role to be in this horror film if it was my baby brother in the ICU. He was the one who got the phone call from their dad saying he would not be coming to the hospital and passed this upsetting information along to everyone else.
Hello again, I’m breaking my silence. Part of the reason for it was that last week Chris, LLC and I jetted off to Malta for a last minute break. This was our first week long family holiday of three to somewhere hot, but not too hot, we’re talking the low 30s C / high 80s/low 90s F.
The ABORTION SQUAD were part of the few hardcore punk from the New Hampshire scene, among bands like the MURDERERS, the MIGHTY CO'S and AGROPHOBIC ARRAY... they are incontestably the most primitive and brutal band from this scene, playing intense and spontaneous hardcore with a real "fuck you" punk attitude.
Stamp/Image: Stampin Up ' In Full Bloom' and ' Well Scripted'
But somewhere along the way I seem to have lost my ability to knit, or at least, I’ve lost the ability to do anything but row after row of stocking stitch. Increasing without creating holes in my work is a problem I need to solve (Snape’s face depends on it) and, sad to admit, I even had to look up how to cast off because I couldn’t remember how to do it. Fortunately knitting is a pretty well-covered hobby on the internet and so there’s a million tutorials on every possible subject and even helpful videos, so hopefully the holey face will soon be sorted, but working on the doll has re-kindled my enjoyment of knitting and I’m seriously considering making a
Band assisted pull ups
Bring on week five…here we go!
They often work with the public sector and commented in this lecture that people do not understand why the government as for private businesses to rebrand a town. It is an understandable argument as it is public money being spent on design rather than welfare, but Hemisphere’s argument is that design created by unprofessional people are not to the same standard. Although the tools and software are easily available it is not created to the same effectiveness.
Beatles Here comes the sun UK
happy, for a while.
And while my own utility companies treat me like a stranger--or worse--I've noticed lately that store clerks and cashiers are my "close" friends these days.What is with the weird-ass questions they are asking these days to give the impression of faux friendly?
This is my favorite of the three, although it is quite different than the other two.
‘True Love’ and ‘True Love 2: Trouble In Paradise’ is a independent collaboration between Manien Botma and Jason Turner, a writer and penciller couple who have been together for ten years (and recently got married after the completion of ‘True Love 2′). Unlike the vast majority of western comics ‘True Loves’ is set in none other than Vancouver, Canada, rather than America. The small series follows True, a twenty something boutique clothes shop owner, and Zander, a fruit and vegetable grocer with eccentric hair.
I finally got to my Craft Desk! So with that I am here to bring you the latest challenge
Doily Die : Papertrey Ink
Sticking with the iconography, I went with the Creative Commons logo (and for BoingBoing readers, it's bleached, not shaved). I'm not getting paid for it, I'm just a big fan of their work moving beyond the restrictive, anachronistic, and self-defeating standard way of handling copyright. When people ask me about this thing on the back of my head, I'll be handing them a slip of paper that says:
Later we hiked all around town. There is a large covered pazar which sells all kinds of goods. Above the city on a hill there is a small park. For a lira admission you can go in and see a panoramic view of the whole town. Up on the far side you may be able to see a large yellow building. That is a restored Ottoman mansion, which is now a museum.
If I told you that there was a literary agent who promoted his services via a series of videos featuring a sex doll, would you believe me?
is the face of a newly adoptive mother.
I had met and become friends with someone who was a help in that arena, then disappeared, and who has come back into my life as a catalyst in my new reading promotion activities now, 10 years later.
I have tried. I’ve seen the movie more than once; aware, since my first viewing, of its eminence. This was director F.W. Murnau’s greatest American film—some say his greatest, period. Its in-camera effects, particularly in the film’s first half, conjured a world where the boundaries between fantasy and reality fell away. Viewers were, and still are, mesmerized by every brain-boggling scene, myself included. But I’m unable to divorce Sunrise’s technical brilliance from its story. It is about the fall, then heroic rise, of a sociopath.
So, whichever side is winning, that is my side,
Given by Papa God, March 5, 2012
Thank you for reading my post on Collectors Quest. I
Police from Moon Township were surprised by what they found — a woman and her kids — when they used a search warrant in connection with a prostitution case that involves a retired Pittsburgh police detective…police were looking for evidence in the case against Talib Kevin Ghafoor when they went to an address on Collins Avenue…early Thursday morning. “Right now, she’s got her front door and back door smashed in,” said Harvey Moore, the father of a woman who lives in that home. Moore told Channel 4 Action News that the woman and her children — ages 15, 5 and 4 — were asleep when a team that included SWAT members and state troopers approached the building and entered through the front and rear doors.
Forstner bit (some people call them hinge cutters) -
These were simple pleasures at the close of my weekend. What were the spring beauties in yours?
Make a fort over the dining room table. Remind them how it was a popular thing to do when you were younger.
JVC is known for it’s impressive audio systems. They are now tapping into the portable audio system market with the release of their JVC NXPN7 Portable Audio System with Dual iPod Docks.
-I ran water over the bottle after it was hot from the fire. The directions say to submerge it- This may work better, so if possible I recommend that!
I just started “The Circle Maker” by Mark Batterson. I have only read two chapters and am already uncomfortable, convicted is actually the right word.
Wormwood:..A rustic herb, grey-white in colour.
Fall of Melnibone - Dark Moor
11So keep watch on yourselves, and see that you have love for the Lord your God.
Sean: "What's that on your finger?"
If you didn't catch me on WHYY's Radio Times show this morning, well, I think it went pretty well. They did a show on the PLCB's desperate attempt to stave off privatization -- and despite what PJ Stapleton said this morning about they're just an agency, not trying to shape the debate or anything, it's very hard not to see this burst of ideas to make the PLCB suddenly more like a private system as anything but a desperate attempt for everyone to keep their jobs...by keeping us under their thumbs.
“You know what I forgot to do?” mom said with a weird look on her face. “Tonight is Mexican Thursdays and I forgot to tell Sandra I was going out of town! I guess I will just go.”
Everything in front of you is yours
It is a kind of balance that is his glory. He rides the drifts like an escaped ski. His course is the caress of the hill. His track is a drawing of the snow in a moment of its particular arrangement with wind and rock. Something in him so loves the world that he gives himself to the laws of gravity and chance.
Hear from Gary and Norma yourself:
Corset: Plank Couture
While he was wrapping up his speech, a really, really important person in the religious community asked Jesus to dinner. Jesus happily came, but then was immediately criticized for not following the exact letter of the law in The Book of Religious Institution Rules before sitting down to eat.
the finished product!
no salvation
David Simpson — Distinguished Professor of English, G.B. Needham Chair
We found the Waterfront Restaurant to have much better food with its a la carte offerings. Both the Plantation and Waterfront food is 'free' to passengers on-board, although drinks are extra and must be paid for. You can order as much food as you want at the Waterfront, but it's recommended to make a booking for dinner as they are often full.
Morello: Increase the cool-down on Irelia’s ultimate and nerf her W.
Also, Civic Center Eats starts JUNE 7th. Join us and your favorite food vendors and spread some sunshine.
Please check out the CAS-ual Fridays Blog for challenge details and rules, more info on the sponsor and some great Clear and Simple eye candy from the Girl Fridays!
On November 12, 2001, the United States experienced its second deadliest aviation accident in history. It occurred when American Airlines Flight 587 crashed into the Belle Harbor neighborhood of Queens, New York. The accident took place two months after the September 11 terrorist attacks, and it caused panic in New York. Thousands of people witnessed the Airbus A300 crash to the ground, killing all 260 people on board. Many people reported a fire and explosion before the plane crashed, but the National Transportation Safety Board attributed the disaster to the first officer’s overuse of rudder controls. Al-Qaeda has listed the crash among its successes, but physical evidence was never presented indicating terrorist activity. Surprisingly, the story was widely underreported in the United States, considering the magnitude of the crash. In the months after the tragedy, rumors were circulated that suggested that the plane was exploded by a shoe bomber, similar to the failed attempt of Richard Reid, but these claims are unsubstantiated.
Work is now underway to reach out to breweries, brewpubs and on-premise retailers to get their support in a cooperative effort among industry partners. The aim is to raise funds for Us TOO’s outreach efforts and to spark a grassroots effort to reach men that might be missed through traditional health education programs.
Like it matters what the head of the Washington Democratic Party thinks. Who has been more important to the Democratic Party (or at least certain parts of the party) over the years? Dennis Kucinich or some state party chairman that no one outside of Washington has ever heard of until now?
At any rate, HOPEFULLY sometime in the next week or two we will have a squishy new baby to love.
Now I do not work in a particularly "t-shirty" environment. Not only is it generally far too cold for such attire, but my workplace is reasonably formal. Never fear, I was wearing an appropriate pair of black suit trousers and a formal jacket over the top.
1 lacking
Don’t worry though as I’m certainly not going to let the black cloud descend. Nietzsche once wrote, (in The Genealogy Of Morals)
Secure Future
I held the ladder. It was leaned against a few rather spindly branches and the man without fear climbed up. He tied a rope around the branch with the swarm on it. Just about that time a couple of guys showed up who thought that seeing a swarm like that was a once in a lifetime opportunity. I didn't bother to mention that we captured five of our own swarms last year. I mean, the guys were super excited. Plus now we had helpers! While my boys looked on from the comfort of the car, I held the ladder, the new helpers pulled the branch down with the rope, and the man cut the branch.
Nathan continues to make progress in speech, day-to-day life skills, and understanding of what is going on around him. We can say "Nathan do" or "Nathan say" and he will attempt to copy almost everything. He can initiate several songs and knows the hand motions for each. He has a particular way he holds his hand to "request" a certain song and now has a key word to represent each song (OK...a by-stander would not understand the key word, but we can tell it's a particular sound for a certain song). He can show you his eyes, nose, head, ears, and mouth if you ask. Little Mister is also using the potty quite a bit....at home and once today at school. I'm sure we have a long way to go...but it's a very positive start! This is his "I just used the potty and everyone is praising me" smile.....
There is no doubting in Scripture that there is great confidence in many of God’s great saints (Job 19:25-27; 2 Kings 20:3; John 15:11). Paul is often greatly confident in his own conversion (Gal. 2:20). Scripture seems to encourage all believers to test and have similar confidence (2 Pet. 1:5-8). Yet, once again, such confidence is no sign of true religion. Self-confidence is a basic quality of the “natural man” who would obviously feel no doubt of himself.[7] This is obvious in the hypocrisy of the Pharisees who never appeared to doubt themselves (John 9:40). To Edwards, hypocrisy has two types: those concerned with the external, and those concerned with the internal.[8]The first is simply one who is moral and good in their own mind with regards to works, and Edwards finds this deception to be more easily dealt with. The internal hypocrite is far more confident in their “righteousness of discoveries and of experience of humiliation, exalting to heaven with them.” Such a person exalts the ‘saving work’ of experience and emotion above the grace of God in Christ.
The Springtime Flower Poem
Ink: Early Espresso, Calypso Coral and Soft Suede
Exercise -- 20 - 45 minutes
Not just the world
Hugo is considered by critics as the best 3D visual event of the decade – it’s not just about the 3D effects and the visual appeal, Hugo boasts an incredible story and an emotional/inspiring journey for Asa Butterfield’s character, Hugo Cabret. The story ran a bit slow at first – I think the initial part of the film was dedicated to its special effects and the emphasis on its stunning art direction (including production design, costume, make-up) – which is simply the best I’ve seen so far. As soon as the plot developed, the flow was good, the editing was brilliant and the screenplay was spot on. I personally cannot relate too much with the story – not a huge fan of this kind of genre but for some, it is captivating enough. The brilliant performance of Asa as Hugo and the rest of the cast helped in giving this artistically executed masterpiece more life and more depth. Sacha Baron Cohen was, as always, exceptional – he is such a talented but underrated performer. As the irritating train inspector, Cohen delivered fantastically!
Oh, quickly before we start - Monday sees the start of an all-new (and just nineteen years after the first series) ten part run of Sounds Of The Seventies at 10pm, including that Jean Genie.
About six years ago I did the Fat Flush diet and I lost about 35 pounds. I was wearing a size eight, I was working out and had serious muscle tone, my skin cleared up and most importantly I felt GOOD. Now, I am a size 14 or sixteen, depending on the store, my muscles have turned to flab and I feel like utter crap. I am self-conscious of my size, my gut, my triple chin. I disgust myself.
I’ve also got a small wood project in the works, which I’ll give you guys pictures when it’s completely finished but I’ve got a few supplies I need yet :T
Hard wreath
However, austerity measures may not be enough to calm the markets. Marchel Alexandrovich, an economist at Jefferies International in London was quoted as saying,
Local Representative Cost: Free
Put everything in a bowl, mix and mash just slightly and serve with your favorite tortilla chips.
Revived by Cat Patrick (Final Copy)
01 Factory (2:04)
Harvard University and the Massachusetts Institute of Technology [MIT] announced today the formation of a new partnership to provide online learning via the Internet. The new edX, which has been set up as a not-for-profit entity equally owned and funded by the two universities, will offer Harvard and MIT courses for free. The partners hope to create a global community of on-line students; they also hope to use the service as a way to understand and improve on-line learning.
Rapidly boil the remaining liquid until it has reduced to serve as a syrup. Serve cool.
"They've got a pool, an in-land lake, tennis courts, horses and a place to live all summer. I know they need a lifeguard this summer. My dad's on the board of directors. Let me talk to him."
There’s nothing progressive about trying to feed a bloated and ineffective agency more and more revenue in the hope that it will magically turn into the type of agency that manages the transit systems of Washington, D.C., or Paris.
You might want to tell me you made a lot of money – and I might answer you: “a lot of money is neither able to buy happiness nor love.”
hey peeps, this is my first post on wordpress and I do hope you guys have fun on this page.
In the preface to “Negroes With Guns,” Williams writes: “I have asserted the right of Negroes to meet the violence of the Ku Klux Klan by armed self-defense — and have acted on it. It has always been an accepted right of Americans, as the history of our Western states proves, that where the law is unable, or unwilling, to enforce order, the citizens can, and must act in self-defense against lawless violence.”
to have to go to bed.
Cultivation: Grows wild!
Renewal.
I am saddened by the mayday affairs, oakland, 2012. But its of less significance to me than the battle against the lightbox we face in our homes, those of us who have homes. For I believe in no greater cause than helping you, me and everyone everywhere, escape the savage and brutal addiction to this once marvel of engineering become luxury item become mass-produced producer of idiocy via artificial contrived morality tales to snakeskin sales pitch to fear-propragating political weaponry, become feng shui killbot 2000, become that which we must now look out for as gravity takes it from the arms of the desperate and suicidal multitudes who have lost all personal integrity and dignity and in reactionary thoughtfully thoughtless rage, find immediate end to all projected yet false happenings which have made superfluous the very lifeblood flowing through them, to the sole singular purpose of pressing a few simple buttons to todays essential pseudo life-giving (soul stealing) contrivance or advertisement or other lobotomized offal better known to drainage pipes and sewer systems and other some such forgotten, abandoned, set away from human senses so as not to offend, offendors of our tentative and more than ever before gelatinous hold on society, culture, and inspirational zeitgeist! The television seduction.
For some reason, the older I get, the more annoying Harold becomes. And I just can’t convince Mom that Harold is bad for my social life.
It's now week 46 and Kingsley Egbuonu has landed in a jurisdiction that was not even in existence as an independent state this time last year -- Africa's newest country, South Sudan. It seems that the fledgling country is making a huge effort at this early stage. Let Kingsley explain in his own words:
I couldn’t see everything so I walked around the house to find a better view. There were two windows on the first side of the house. The first was a window for the kitchen. It was a mess pots and pans were everywhere. The next window was a bedroom. It was trashed too except for the bed, which had a woman passed out across it. She looked like a typical prostitute. Short skirt and a tub top. I knocked on the window. She stirred and sat up. I knocked again and she turned around and saw me, I smiled. She got up and stumbled toward the window. She stared at me then opened it.
Themes for this edition are the following.
For those who have seen the highs, the lows, the in between
Okruashvili was arrested, but then freed on multimillion-dollar bail after he retracted his allegations.
Debra and the entire Tres Fabu team;
a priceless work of art about her weekend happenings and all about the hermit crab she picked up at the beach
I started blogging, would you believe it, in 2007, writing a blog called 'Dramatic Licence' to publicise the productions for my am-dram society. It was part of a community of blogs linked to the online sites for local newspapers. In between shows I added posts about my own life and, in the summer of that year, wrote a series of travel diaries, 'Mum's Gone to Iceland'. When the newspaper blogging group closed down I decided to start again and began this blog in 2009, uploading my travel diaries so they wouldn't be lost.
1Kings 4:26 thru 28:
Ok so I've got a job.
In the case of Paice LLC v. Toyota Motor Corporation, the E.D. Texas found that Toyota infringed Paice's patent. Since Ebay, permanent injunctions are no longer granted as a matter of course, and the district courts must use the four-factor test to determine a proper equitable remedy.
Great programme for me as my family is steeped in local history - we've gone back a few generations and still in the locality. My Dad, Mum, Sister and Aunt all worked in the dockyard until it's closure in the 1980s (thanks Mrs Thatcher!) and I believe previous generations did too.
Me: “You mean the JETSONS?”
Life requires so much from us at times it can feel overwhelming. My son took deep breaths telling me how nervous he was on the way to City Hall for his interview. His palms were sweaty because he wanted it so bad and at the same time worried if he would be able to do a good job if he got it. So much responsibility. My daughter is on her bed now with all her study notes sprawled across the quilt. Reading them over one last time hoping she passes while feeling bad that she has too many pimples on her face and that no cute guy likes her. My friend is feeling the void of losing her dad earlier this year and the family that is slowly disappearing around her while her ex-husband is gaining. Is jealous that he has moved on and she hasn’t had one meaningful relationship since the split. Worrying if being happy and alone isn’t so healthy after all.
Abe Lincoln once said “You can fool some of the people all of the time and all of the people some of the time, but you can’t fool all the people all of the time.”
I returned to the Konos resource material and saw that we’re about to start a unit full of geography, history and science. I remembered that this week the girls presented some of their own parables: allegories for Christian living today. The metaphors were rich, detailed, accurate and full of scripture. What a blessing! Who really even needs history or geography when you have a living relationship with the One who made and owns the mountains, who was there for all the history?
Expected FG: 1.020
it has been nothing short of miraculous.
On second thought, you might find a little more freedom and better cost of living in China.
Victory MMA returned Saturday night for its third event at the Academie Sportive in the Park Extension neighbourhood of Montreal.
I know you whom call yourselves “white” did not think that you would be allowed to just go on in a world that you STOLE right? Well guess what you whom call yourselves “white?” I KNOW YOUR DEEPEST and DARKEST Secrets. And I’ll bet you would like to know just what those Secrets consists of now don’t you?
I still haven't decided what I'm wearing out tonight so let's just hope the nail varnish goes!!!
It's so easy--and important. Your fellow cooks will respect you more. Your chef will respect you more. It will become something of an obsession (if you're like me) and the first time someone looks at your station and says "Wow." it will make you feel very good. As it becomes a part of your daily standards, you will start to transform into a better, sharper cook. There is no other way.
Again, THANK YOU SO MUCH FOR MAKING THIS A SUCCESSFUL BLOG HOP!! Please come visit us soon, as we have much more in store to share with you.
I totally stole today's look from the lovely Slastena at About All and Nothing At All. She always looks fabulous and this outfit was no exception. I love the pairing of leopard with the soft blue-green cardi.
Individuals can’t do much to make their System 1 decisions more accurate, so ultimately they can improve their thinking and decision-making only by training their System 2 to be vigilant for common System 1 mistakes and to stop being so lazy. The book is replete with examples of common System 1 errors, such as:
Bearing the latter in mind, it doesn’t make a lot of sense to spend a great deal of time lifting lightweights does it? Unless you are training for speed, but that is a whole different issue.
in the meadows, moving through ditch clover.
Enjoy your days!
“Dembski: In the next five years, molecular Darwinism — the idea that Darwinian processes can produce complex molecular structures at the sub-cellular level — will be dead. When that happens, evolutionary biology will experience a crisis of confidence because evolutionary biology hinges on the evolution of the right molecules. I therefore foresee a Taliban-style collapse of Darwinism in the next ten years.” Anonymous (Touchstone Magazine), (2004). “The Measure of Design: A conversation about the past, present & future of Darwinism and Design.” Touchstone, 17(6), pp. 60-65.p. 64.
But these two boys are students of the same high school as Anaru and Jintan and they start a whispered conversation finding Anaru and Jintan there.
We have heard in the Gospel reading about towns where Our Lord did the vast majority of His work, and He condemns them because they did not believe. It is quite amazing to hear what He has to say about these other towns, about Tyre and Sidon, about Sodom and Gomorrah, that Sodom would still have been around to that particular day if the works done in Capernaum had been done in Sodom. We all know what happened in Sodom, the horrible sins that were going on there, the gross homosexuality and all the problems that they had. And we know that when the angels came to Sodom, they wanted to sodomize the angels. Yet Our Lord is telling us that if those works that He did had been done in Sodom, Sodom would still be standing because the people would have converted.
We gathered for filling the barrel at Walker's house on March 4th, the day before my 32nd birthday, and it was a great birthday gift to start a barrel project with such a fun group of talented brewers. We had brewed a total of 60 gallons, which almost topped off the barrel, and we are hoping to brew a "top-off" batch soon to fill the remaining head-space and provide filler for the "angel's share" which will evaporate off through the wood (or be diminished by taste tests!) in the coming months or years. Currently there is about a 4-inch head-space in the barrel which I would like to eliminate sooner than later, to keep any acetic acid producing bacteria from turning this into the world's biggest batch of homebrewed malt vinegar. That would take a lot of pommes frites to soak up!
Till later then,
Ok - before I get too tearful - here's my favorite template - in my favorite colors - all set to hold a special little "gem" of a gift *tee hee* This is a template from MyTimeMadeEasy and is probably my all time favorite gift box - I've re-created this little box so many times in so many ways but I went back to my original design for this one today. Pink and green and lace and flowers --- my idea of feminine.
3. His mother thought he was God."
2 c half-n-half
On the plus side, we've got everything ready for our little boy. My bags are packed, his bags are packed, his carseat is in place, and everything else imaginable is all set.
Ryan and I had a very interesting conversation yesterday about taking Charlie out in his chair, which we are doing a lot. Yesterday we went to the mall (not the choo choo mall, another one) and Ryan chased Charlie while I purchased new tennis shoes. Charlie was on the move and weaved through people and traveled up and down the "streets" of this outdoor area with lots of restaurants. Diners eating at outside tables greeted Charlie, and he chatted, and a group of people started chanting Go, Charlie Go! (His shirt had his name on it). He met a representative, randomly, from the Paralympics. People inevitably smile, poke each other and whisper about how cute Charlie is, how he is doing so great. They say hello to him, and try to catch his attention. I lost Charlie and Ryan for a few, and everyone knew just where they were - because who could miss a cute little boy like Charlie. Especially because he is rolling around in his red wheelchair.
Foreword by the Hon. Michael Kirby AC, CMG
anyhoo. that's my yadda yadda for now.
And, it’s re-occurring on a regular basis, with more frequency this year.
All in all I have to say I am so grateful for my amazing mom that kept Preston day and night and let me be the best mom I could be to Porter. I am so grateful for all of the friends that brought over dinner that week, and for all the sweet phone calls and text message. If there is one thing i know for sure, it is that we are so blessed and so loved.
The mantrAs of the first and tenth manDalAs are by many different RSis and are interesting – because you will find indra, agastya, yama, parAs’ara and others as RSIs of the mantrAs. I wonder why vEda vyAsa did this.
If anyone reading this truly believes that the likes of Trevor Philips, Diane Abbot, Keith Vaz, Darcus Howe, Bonnie Greer, Tariq Ali, Weyman Bennett, Yasmin Alibhai-Brown, or even the sainted Shami Chakrabarti, care for the future of the native British people and have not used their privileged positions within our society to advance the interests of their own races over those of our race, I really suggest you are perhaps to naïve to be abroad unchaperoned at this most deadly of times.
Pray with us, that God meets our needs. Cherie’s teeth are continuing to get worse. To get all of them pulled would cost a bundle and then she would need dentures, to get them fixed is astronomical, and not something we can come close to being able to pay for. She was in great pain yesterday so I would greatly appreciate your prayers. Also pray that God makes a way for me to start a bible study here in town, for there is great need among those considered less desirable by some.
6. U.S. Blues - 13:15
Does this mean that we will soon all have access to a crystal ball type program that anyone can buy for 59.99 through some affiliate link on any of the thousands of websites that would be willing to advertise this product?
Beer Log: May 9, 2009
. Also Lily has asked me everyday since then if the baby is coming out today.
At 18.oo we drive back to Selkirk, to Philip Burn Hotel for dinner. It has a nice affordable bistro and the waiter is funny. We have a good simple hearty meal. I have the pork chops and Klaas the venison sausages. For dessert we share tiramisu. At the B&B we walk for a while and see a dog up the hill who is playing with sticks on his own. I have still problems with my balance, I feel like I’m still on the ferry. I want to knit, but my card with directions is gone, left on the boat? I saw a woolshop in Selkirk and had plans to knit Klaas a sailors sweater. My sleeves of my other sweater have to wait till I’m home where my other directions are. Klaas finished his blog, and we browse online. Now he is reading a magazine while I blog about day 2, today. Almost bedtime.
For some reason (and maybe Pink attempts to explain it later in the book), our educational system has completely ignored this research. Our educational system is entirely based on extrinsic motivation.
I love to do a night-time eye. It’s definitely my favourite part of doing my make-up.
Okay, maybe it's more like "shade goddess". Still, I think this is exactly what the doctor ordered, along with an ice cold margarita, some Mayan Pyramids and a Zipline tomorrow...
06. Get Lucky
What question didn't I ask that I should have?
But Charlie Chuck had other problems when he moved into the house for the Fringe.
The attorneys who gave letters of opinion to the investment banks blessing securitization of home and commercial mortgages as they were presented and launched are in deep hot water. This is especially true since the law firms that engaged in these “blessings” had lawyers quitting their jobs leaving behind memorandums to the partners that the law firm itself was committing crimes. The similarity between the blessing of the law firm and the ratings of Moody’s, S&P, Fitch is surprising to some people.
Head on over to Celebrate the Occasion to see how the other design team members interpreted the sketch -- and upload a photo of your creation, too!
*“Death of a Salesman” by Arthur Miller.
The one Vietnam-related activity I had participated in was also the only worthwhile thing I did in twenty-four months on active duty: I arranged for the burial in Arlington National Cemetery of an Army officer who’d been killed in Saigon during the 1968 Tet Offensive, and I spent the last six months of my service working with the man’s family. I also talked about this each spring but avoided drawing any “conclusions” or “lessons” from it.
This seemingly casual, on-the-go human interaction with the biosphere—simply replanting root stocks now and again, and returning every once in a while to harvest, replant, clear away, and prune—helped to bring into existence what are now highly refined, industrially useful plant species. Bananas, in particular, are an excellent example of a food that has become so thoroughly enmeshed in international economic systems of consumption and export that they bear little formal or nutritional resemblance to their genetic forebears.
On our first trip to London, one of the places on my list was the Temple Church where my historical crush, William Marshall, is buried. Unfortunately, due to the limited hours the church is open to the public, it wasn't possible. When I knew I was going to be in London again for a few days last summer, figuring out the church's hours and making sure to get there was my main mission. Again, the hours were very limited, but I was able to go first thing one morning and even the pouring down rain wasn't going to stop me! Even though it does not have the same awe-inspiring heights of the country's cathedrals, this small church is still quite beautiful.
“Jenkins is not only this year, but a long-term player here as far as I’m concerned,” Jerry claimed.
But my mind is made up
Papers: American Crafts, Echo Park, Bella Blvd. and Bazzill cardstock.
Fascinating, because who knew that “Mother” was a genre (Mamma Mia!)? Or that The Matrix falls…
Did any of you make a bracket this year?
Addison was already very weak, the blood the woman had taken from her making her even more so. Her eyes quickly rolled back in her head and she passed out, her head resting backwards against the soft cushions of the high backed couch.
And then my long suppressed memories of gentility came crashing to the surface. There among the riff-raff cars were Mercedes, Bentley and Ferrari. Oh, ma mère et mon père, how could I have forgotten you? Forgive your poor humble, long lost son.
